“We should start back,” Gared urged as the woods began to grow dark around them.
“The wildlings are dead.”
“Do the dead frighten you?” Ser Waymar Royce asked with just the hint of a smile.
Gared did not rise to the bait. He was an old man, past fifty, and he had seen the lordlings come and go. “Dead is dead,” he said. “We have no business with the dead.”
“Are they dead?” Royce asked softly. “What proof have we?”
“Will saw them,” Gared said. “If he says they are dead, that’s proof enough for me.”
Will had known they would drag him into the quarrel sooner or later. He wished it had been later rather than sooner. “My mother told me that dead men sing no songs,” he put in.
“My wet nurse said the same thing, Will,” Royce replied. “Never believe anything you hear at a woman’s tit. There are things to be learned even from the dead.” His voice echoed, too loud in the twilit forest.
“We have a long ride before us,” Gared pointed out. “Eight days, maybe nine. And night is falling.”
Ser Waymar Royce glanced at the sky with disinterest. “It does that every day about this time. Are you unmanned by the dark, Gared?”
Will could see the tightness around Gared’s mouth, the barely suppressed anger in his eyes under the thick black hood of his cloak. Gared had spent forty years in the Night’s Watch, man and boy, and he was not accustomed to being made light of. Yet it was more than that. Under the wounded pride, Will could sense something else in the older man. You could taste it; a nervous tension that came perilous close to fear.
Will shared his unease. He had been four years on the Wall. The first time he had been sent beyond, all the old stories had come rushing back, and his bowels had turned to water. He had laughed about it afterward. He was a veteran of a hundred rangings by now, and the endless dark wilderness that the southron called the haunted forest had no more terrors for him.
Until tonight. Something was different tonight. There was an edge to this darkness that made his hackles rise. Nine days they had been riding, north and northwest and then north again, farther and farther from the Wall, hard on the track of a band of Wildling raiders. Each day had been worse than the day that had come before it. Today was the worst of all. A cold wind was blowing out of the north, and it made the trees rustle like living things. All day, Will had felt as though something were watching him, something cold and implacable that loved him not. Gared had felt it too. Will wanted nothing so much as to ride hellbent for the safety of the Wall, but that was not a feeling to share with your commander.
Especially not a commander like this one.
Ser Waymar Royce was the youngest son of an ancient house with too many heirs. He was a handsome youth of eighteen, grey-eyed and graceful and slender as a knife. Mounted on his huge black destrier, the knight towered above Will and Gared on their smaller garrons. He wore black leather boots, black woolen pants, black moleskin gloves, and a fine supple coat of gleaming black ringmail over layers of black wool and boiled leather. Ser Waymar had been a Sworn Brother of the Night’s Watch for less than half a year, but no one could say he had not prepared for his vocation. At least insofar as his wardrobe was concerned.
His cloak was his crowning glory; sable, thick and black and soft as sin. “Bet he killed them all himself, he did,” Gared told the barracks over wine, “twisted their little heads off, our mighty warrior.” They had all shared the laugh.
It is hard to take orders from a man you laughed at in your cups, Will reflected as he sat shivering atop his garron. Gared must have felt the same.
“Mormont said as we should track them, and we did,” Gared said. “They’re dead. They shan’t trouble us no more. There’s hard riding before us. I don’t like this weather. If it snows, we could be a fortnight getting back, and snow’s the best we can hope for. Ever seen an ice storm, my lord?”
The lordling seemed not to hear him. He studied the deepening twilight in that half-bored, half-distracted way he had. Will had ridden with the knight long enough to understand that it was best not to interrupt him when he looked like that. “Tell me again what you saw, Will. All the details. Leave nothing out.”
Will had been a hunter before he joined the Night’s Watch. Well, a poacher in truth. Mallister freeriders had caught him red-handed in the Mallisters’ own woods, skinning one of the Mallisters’ own bucks, and it had been a choice of putting on the black or losing a hand. No one could move through the woods as silent as Will, and it had not taken the black brothers long to discover his talent.
“The camp is two miles farther on, over that ridge, hard beside a stream,” Will said. “I got close as I dared. There’s eight of them, men and women both. No children I could see. They put up a lean-to against the rock. The snow’s pretty well covered it now, but I could still make it out. No fire burning, but the firepit was still plain as day. No one moving. I watched a long time. No living man ever lay so still.”
“Did you see any blood?”
“Well, no,” Will admitted.
“Did you see any weapons?”
“Some swords, a few bows. One man had an axe. Heavy-looking, double-bladed, a cruel piece of iron. It was on the ground beside him, right by his hand.”
“Did you make note of the position of the bodies?”
Will shrugged. “A couple are sitting up against the rock. Most of them on the ground. Fallen, like.”
“Or sleeping,” Royce suggested.
“Fallen,” Will insisted. “There’s one woman up an ironwood, half-hid in the branches. A far-eyes.” He smiled thinly. “I took care she never saw me. When I got closer, I saw that she wasn’t moving neither.” Despite himself, he shivered.
“You have a chill?” Royce asked.
“Some,” Will muttered. “The wind, m’lord.”
The young knight turned back to his grizzled man-at-arms. Frost-fallen leaves whispered past them, and Royce’s destrier moved restlessly. “What do you think might have killed these men, Gared?” Ser Waymar asked casually. He adjusted the drape of his long sable cloak.
“It was the cold,” Gared said with iron certainty. “I saw men freeze last winter, and the one before, when I was half a boy. Everyone talks about snows forty foot deep, and how the ice wind comes howling out of the north, but the real enemy is the cold. It steals up on you quieter than Will, and at first you shiver and your teeth chatter and you stamp your feet and dream of mulled wine and nice hot fires. It burns, it does. Nothing burns like the cold. But only for a while. Then it gets inside you and starts to fill you up, and after a while you don’t have the strength to fight it. It’s easier just to sit down or go to sleep. They say you don’t feel any pain toward the end. First you go weak and drowsy, and everything starts to fade, and then it’s like sinking into a sea of warm milk. Peaceful, like.”
“Such eloquence, Gared,” Ser Waymar observed. “I never suspected you had it in you.”
“I’ve had the cold in me too, lordling.” Gared pulled back his hood, giving Ser Waymar a good long look at the stumps where his ears had been. “Two ears, three toes, and the little finger off my left hand. I got off light. We found my brother frozen at his watch, with a smile on his face.”
Ser Waymar shrugged. “You ought dress more warmly, Gared.”
Gared glared at the lordling, the scars around his ear holes flushed red with anger where Maester Aemon had cut the ears away. “We’ll see how warm you can dress when the winter comes.” He pulled up his hood and hunched over his garron, silent and sullen.
“If Gared said it was the cold …” Will began.
“Have you drawn any watches this past week, Will?”
“Yes, m’lord.” There never was a week when he did not draw a dozen bloody watches. What was the man driving at?
“And how did you find the Wall?”
“Weeping,” Will said, frowning. He saw it clear enough, now that the lordling had pointed it out. “They couldn’t have froze. Not if the Wall was weeping. It wasn’t cold enough.”
Royce nodded. “Bright lad. We’ve had a few light frosts this past week, and a quick flurry of snow now and then, but surely no cold fierce enough to kill eight grown men. Men clad in fur and leather, let me remind you, with shelter near at hand, and the means of making fire.” The knight’s smile was cocksure. “Will, lead us there. I would see these dead men for myself.”
And then there was nothing to be done for it. The order had been given, and honor bound them to obey.
Will went in front, his shaggy little garron picking the way carefully through the undergrowth. A light snow had fallen the night before, and there were stones and roots and hidden sinks lying just under its crust, waiting for the careless and the unwary. Ser Waymar Royce came next, his great black destrier snorting impatiently. The warhorse was the wrong mount for ranging, but try and tell that to the lordling. Gared brought up the rear. The old man-at-arms muttered to himself as he rode.
Twilight deepened. The cloudless sky turned a deep purple, the color of an old bruise, then faded to black. The stars began to come out. A half-moon rose. Will was grateful for the light.
“We can make a better pace than this, surely,” Royce said when the moon was full risen.
“Not with this horse,” Will said. Fear had made him insolent. “Perhaps my lord would care to take the lead?”
Ser Waymar Royce did not deign to reply.
Somewhere off in the wood a wolf howled.
Will pulled his garron over beneath an ancient gnarled ironwood and dismounted.
“Why are you stopping?” Ser Waymar asked.
“Best go the rest of the way on foot, m’lord. It’s just over that ridge.”
Royce paused a moment, staring off into the distance, his face reflective. A cold wind whispered through the trees. His great sable cloak stirred behind like something half-alive.
“There’s something wrong here,” Gared muttered.
The young knight gave him a disdainful smile. “Is there?”
“Can’t you feel it?” Gared asked. “Listen to the darkness.”
Will could feel it. Four years in the Night’s Watch, and he had never been so afraid. What was it?
“Wind. Trees rustling. A wolf. Which sound is it that unmans you so, Gared?” When Gared did not answer, Royce slid gracefully from his saddle. He tied the destrier securely to a low-hanging limb, well away from the other horses, and drew his longsword from its sheath. Jewels glittered in its hilt, and the moonlight ran down the shining steel. It was a splendid weapon, castle-forged, and new-made from the look of it. Will doubted it had ever been swung in anger.
“The trees press close here,” Will warned. “That sword will tangle you up, m’lord. Better a knife.”
“If I need instruction, I will ask for it,” the young lord said. “Gared, stay here. Guard the horses.”
Gared dismounted. “We need a fire. I’ll see to it.”
“How big a fool are you, old man? If there are enemies in this wood, a fire is the last thing we want.”
“There’s some enemies a fire will keep away,” Gared said. “Bears and direwolves and … and other things …”
Ser Waymar’s mouth became a hard line. “No fire.”
Gared’s hood shadowed his face, but Will could see the hard glitter in his eyes as he stared at the knight. For a moment he was afraid the older man would go for his sword. It was a short, ugly thing, its grip discolored by sweat, its edge nicked from hard use, but Will would not have given an iron bob for the lordling’s life if Gared pulled it from its scabbard.
Finally Gared looked down. “No fire,” he muttered, low under his breath.
Royce took it for acquiescence and turned away. “Lead on,” he said to Will.
Will threaded their way through a thicket, then started up the slope to the low ridge where he had found his vantage point under a sentinel tree. Under the thin crust of snow, the ground was damp and muddy, slick footing, with rocks and hidden roots to trip you up. Will made no sound as he climbed. Behind him, he heard the soft metallic slither of the lordling’s ringmail, the rustle of leaves, and muttered curses as reaching branches grabbed at his longsword and tugged on his splendid sable cloak.
The great sentinel was right there at the top of the ridge, where Will had known it would be, its lowest branches a bare foot off the ground. Will slid in underneath, flat on his belly in the snow and the mud, and looked down on the empty clearing below.
His heart stopped in his chest. For a moment he dared not breathe. Moonlight shone down on the clearing, the ashes of the firepit, the snow-covered lean-to, the great rock, the little half-frozen stream. Everything was just as it had been a few hours ago.
They were gone. All the bodies were gone.
“Gods!” he heard behind him. A sword slashed at a branch as Ser Waymar Royce gained the ridge. He stood there beside the sentinel, longsword in hand, his cloak billowing behind him as the wind came up, outlined nobly against the stars for all to see.
“Get down!” Will whispered urgently. “Something’s wrong.”
Royce did not move. He looked down at the empty clearing and laughed. “Your dead men seem to have moved camp, Will.”
Will’s voice abandoned him. He groped for words that did not come. It was not possible. His eyes swept back and forth over the abandoned campsite, stopped on the axe. A huge double-bladed battle-axe, still lying where he had seen it last, untouched. A valuable weapon …
“On your feet, Will,” Ser Waymar commanded. “There’s no one here. I won’t have you hiding under a bush.”
Reluctantly, Will obeyed.
Ser Waymar looked him over with open disapproval. “I am not going back to Castle Black a failure on my first ranging. We will find these men.” He glanced around. “Up the tree. Be quick about it. Look for a fire.”
Will turned away, wordless. There was no use to argue. The wind was moving. It cut right through him. He went to the tree, a vaulting grey-green sentinel, and began to climb. Soon his hands were sticky with sap, and he was lost among the needles. Fear filled his gut like a meal he could not digest. He whispered a prayer to the nameless gods of the wood, and slipped his dirk free of its sheath. He put it between his teeth to keep both hands free for climbing. The taste of cold iron in his mouth gave him comfort.
Down below, the lordling called out suddenly, “Who goes there?” Will heard uncertainty in the challenge. He stopped climbing; he listened; he watched.
The woods gave answer: the rustle of leaves, the icy rush of the stream, a distant hoot of a snow owl.
The Others made no sound.
Will saw movement from the corner of his eye. Pale shapes gliding through the wood. He turned his head, glimpsed a white shadow in the darkness. Then it was gone. Branches stirred gently in the wind, scratching at one another with wooden fingers. Will opened his mouth to call down a warning, and the words seemed to freeze in his throat. Perhaps he was wrong. Perhaps it had only been a bird, a reflection on the snow, some trick of the moonlight. What had he seen, after all?
“Will, where are you?” Ser Waymar called up. “Can you see anything?” He was turning in a slow circle, suddenly wary, his sword in hand. He must have felt them, as Will felt them. There was nothing to see. “Answer me! Why is it so cold?”
It was cold. Shivering, Will clung more tightly to his perch. His face pressed hard against the trunk of the sentinel. He could feel the sweet, sticky sap on his cheek.
A shadow emerged from the dark of the wood. It stood in front of Royce. Tall, it was, and gaunt and hard as old bones, with flesh pale as milk. Its armor seemed to change color as it moved; here it was white as new-fallen snow, there black as shadow, everywhere dappled with the deep grey-green of the trees. The patterns ran like moonlight on water with every step it took.
Will heard the breath go out of Ser Waymar Royce in a long hiss. “Come no farther,” the lordling warned. His voice cracked like a boy’s. He threw the long sable cloak back over his shoulders, to free his arms for battle, and took his sword in both hands. The wind had stopped. It was very cold.
The Other slid forward on silent feet. In its hand was a longsword like none that Will had ever seen. No human metal had gone into the forging of that blade. It was alive with moonlight, translucent, a shard of crystal so thin that it seemed almost to vanish when seen edge-on. There was a faint blue shimmer to the thing, a ghost-light that played around its edges, and somehow Will knew it was sharper than any razor.
Ser Waymar met him bravely. “Dance with me then.” He lifted his sword high over his head, defiant. His hands trembled from the weight of it, or perhaps from the cold. Yet in that moment, Will thought, he was a boy no longer, but a man of the Night’s Watch.
The Other halted. Will saw its eyes; blue, deeper and bluer than any human eyes, a blue that burned like ice. They fixed on the longsword trembling on high, watched the moonlight running cold along the metal. For a heartbeat he dared to hope.
They emerged silently from the shadows, twins to the first. Three of them … four … five … Ser Waymar may have felt the cold that came with them, but he never saw them, never heard them. Will had to call out. It was his duty. And his death, if he did. He shivered, and hugged the tree, and kept the silence.
The pale sword came shivering through the air.
Ser Waymar met it with steel. When the blades met, there was no ring of metal on metal; only a high, thin sound at the edge of hearing, like an animal screaming in pain. Royce checked a second blow, and a third, then fell back a step. Another flurry of blows, and he fell back again.
Behind him, to right, to left, all around him, the watchers stood patient, faceless, silent, the shifting patterns of their delicate armor making them all but invisible in the wood. Yet they made no move to interfere.
Again and again the swords met, until Will wanted to cover his ears against the strange anguished keening of their clash. Ser Waymar was panting from the effort now, his breath steaming in the moonlight. His blade was white with frost; the Other’s danced with pale blue light.
Then Royce’s parry came a beat too late. The pale sword bit through the ringmail beneath his arm. The young lord cried out in pain. Blood welled between the rings. It steamed in the cold, and the droplets seemed red as fire where they touched the snow. Ser Waymar’s fingers brushed his side. His moleskin glove came away soaked with red.
The Other said something in a language that Will did not know; his voice was like the cracking of ice on a winter lake, and the words were mocking.
Ser Waymar Royce found his fury. “For Robert!” he shouted, and he came up snarling, lifting the frost-covered longsword with both hands and swinging it around in a flat sidearm slash with all his weight behind it. The Other’s parry was almost lazy.
When the blades touched, the steel shattered.
A scream echoed through the forest night, and the longsword shivered into a hundred brittle pieces, the shards scattering like a rain of needles. Royce went to his knees, shrieking, and covered his eyes. Blood welled between his fingers.
The watchers moved forward together, as if some signal had been given. Swords rose and fell, all in a deathly silence. It was cold butchery. The pale blades sliced through ringmail as if it were silk. Will closed his eyes. Far beneath him, he heard their voices and laughter sharp as icicles.
When he found the courage to look again, a long time had passed, and the ridge below was empty.
He stayed in the tree, scarce daring to breathe, while the moon crept slowly across the black sky. Finally, his muscles cramping and his fingers numb with cold, he climbed down.
Royce’s body lay facedown in the snow, one arm outflung. The thick sable cloak had been slashed in a dozen places. Lying dead like that, you saw how young he was. A boy.
He found what was left of the sword a few feet away, the end splintered and twisted like a tree struck by lightning. Will knelt, looked around warily, and snatched it up. The broken sword would be his proof. Gared would know what to make of it, and if not him, then surely that old bear Mormont or Maester Aemon. Would Gared still be waiting with the horses? He had to hurry.
Will rose. Ser Waymar Royce stood over him.
His fine clothes were a tatter, his face a ruin. A shard from his sword transfixed the blind white pupil of his left eye.
The right eye was open. The pupil burned blue. It saw.
The broken sword fell from nerveless fingers. Will closed his eyes to pray. Long, elegant hands brushed his cheek, then tightened around his throat. They were gloved in the finest moleskin and sticky with blood, yet the touch was icy cold.

The comet’s tail spread across the dawn, a red slash that bled above the 
crags of Dragonstone like a wound in the pink and purple sky.
The maester stood on the windswept balcony outside his chambers. It was here 
the ravens came, after long flight. Their droppings speckled the gargoyles that 
rose twelve feet tall on either side of him, a hellhound and a wyvern, two of 
the thousand that brooded over the walls of the ancient fortress. When first he 
came to Dragonstone, the army of stone grotesques had made him uneasy, but as 
the years passed he had grown used to them. Now he thought of them as old 
friends. The three of them watched the sky together with foreboding.The maester did not believe in omens. And yet . . . old 
as he was, Cressen had never seen a comet half so bright, nor yet that color, 
that terrible color, the color of blood and flame and sunsets. He wondered if 
his gargoyles had ever seen its like. They had been here so much longer than he 
had, and would still be here long after he was gone. If stone tongues could 
speak . . .
Such folly. He leaned against the battlement, the sea crashing 
beneath him, the black stone rough beneath his fingers. Talking gargoyles 
and prophecies in the sky. I am an old done man, grown giddy as a child 
again. Had a lifetime’s hard-won

wisdom fled him along with his health and strength? He was a maester, trained 
and chained in the great Citadel of Oldtown. What had he come to, when 
superstition filled his head as if he were an ignorant fieldhand?
And yet . . . and yet . . . the comet burned 
even by day now, while pale grey steam rose from the hot vents of Dragonmont 
behind the castle, and yestermorn a white raven had brought word from the 
Citadel itself, word long-expected but no less fearful for all that, word of 
summer’s end. Omens, all. Too many to deny. What does it all mean? he 
wanted to cry.
“Maester Cressen, we have visitors.” Pylos spoke softly, as if loath to 
disturb Cressen’s solemn meditations. Had he known what drivel filled his head, 
he would have shouted. “The princess would see the white raven.” Ever 
correct, Pylos called her princess now, as her lord father was a 
king. King of a smoking rock in the great salt sea, yet a king nonetheless. 
“Her fool is with her.”
The old man turned away from the dawn, keeping a hand on his wyvern to steady 
himself. “Help me to my chair and show them in.”
Taking his arm, Pylos led him inside. In his youth, Cressen had walked briskly, 
but he was not far from his eightieth name day now, and his legs were frail and 
unsteady. Two years past, he had fallen and shattered a hip, and it had never 
mended properly. Last year when he took ill, the Citadel had sent Pylos out 
from Oldtown, mere days before Lord Stannis had closed the 
isle . . . to help him in his labors, it was said, but Cressen 
knew the truth.

Pylos had come to replace him when he died. He did not mind. Someone must take 
his place, and sooner than he would like . . .
He let the younger man settle him behind his books and papers. “Go bring her. 
It is ill to keep a lady waiting.” He waved a hand, a feeble gesture of haste 
from a man no longer capable of hastening. His flesh was wrinkled and spotted, 
the skin so papery thin that he could see the web of veins and the shape of 
bones beneath. And how they trembled, these hands of his that had once been so 
sure and deft . . .
When Pylos returned the girl came with him, shy as ever. Behind her, shuffling 
and hopping in that queer sideways walk of his, came her fool. On his head was 
a mock helm fashioned from an old tin bucket, with a rack of deer antlers 
strapped to the crown and hung with cowbells. With his every lurching step, the 
bells rang, each with a different voice, clang-a-dang bong-dong 
ring-a-ling clong clong clong.
“Who comes to see us so early, Pylos?” Cressen said.
“It’s me and Patches, Maester.” Guileless blue eyes blinked at him. Hers was 
not a pretty face, alas. The child had her lord father’s square jut of jaw and 
her mother’s unfortunate ears, along with a disfigurement all her own, the 
legacy of the bout of greyscale that had almost claimed her in the crib. Across 
half one cheek and well down her neck, her flesh was stiff and dead, the skin 
cracked and flaking, mottled black and grey and stony to the touch. “Pylos 
said we might see the white raven.”
“Indeed you may,” Cressen answered. As if he would ever

deny her. She had been denied too often in her time. Her name was Shireen. She 
would be ten on her next name day, and she was the saddest child that Maester 
Cressen had ever known. Her sadness is my shame, the old man thought, 
another mark of my failure. “Maester Pylos, do me a kindness and 
bring the bird down from the rookery for the Lady Shireen.”
“It would be my pleasure.” Pylos was a polite youth, no more than 
five-and-twenty, yet solemn as a man of sixty. If only he had more humor, more 
life in him; that was what was needed here. Grim places needed 
lightening, not solemnity, and Dragonstone was grim beyond a doubt, a lonely 
citadel in the wet waste surrounded by storm and salt, with the smoking shadow 
of the mountain at its back. A maester must go where he is sent, so Cressen had 
come here with his lord some twelve years past, and he had served, and served 
well. Yet he had never loved Dragonstone, nor ever felt truly at home here. Of 
late, when he woke from restless dreams in which the red woman figured 
disturbingly, he often did not know where he was.
The fool turned his patched and piebald head to watch Pylos climb the steep 
iron steps to the rookery. His bells rang with the motion. “Under the sea, the 
birds have scales for feathers,” he said, clang-a-langing. “I know, I know, oh, oh, oh.”
Even for a fool, Patchface was a sorry thing. Perhaps once he could evoke gales 
of laughter with a quip, but the sea had taken that power from him, along with 
half his wits and all his memory. He was soft and obese, subject to twitches 
and trembles,

incoherent as often as not. The girl was the only one who laughed at him now, 
the only one who cared if he lived or died.
An ugly little girl and a sad fool, and maester makes 
three . . . now there is a tale to make men weep. “Sit 
with me, child.” Cressen beckoned her closer. “This is early to come calling, 
scarce past dawn. You should be snug in your bed.”
“I had bad dreams,” Shireen told him. “About the dragons. They were coming 
to eat me.”
The child had been plagued by nightmares as far back as Maester Cressen could 
recall. “We have talked of this before,” he said gently. “The dragons cannot 
come to life. They are carved of stone, child. In olden days, our island was 
the westernmost outpost of the great Freehold of Valyria. It was the Valyrians 
who raised this citadel, and they had ways of shaping stone since lost to us. A 
castle must have towers wherever two walls meet at an angle, for defense. The 
Valyrians fashioned these towers in the shape of dragons to make their fortress 
seem more fearsome, just as they crowned their walls with a thousand gargoyles 
instead of simple crenellations.” He took her small pink hand in his own frail 
spotted one and gave it a gentle squeeze. “So you see, there is nothing to 
fear.”
Shireen was unconvinced. “What about the thing in the sky? Dalla and Matrice 
were talking by the well, and Dalla said she heard the red woman tell Mother 
that it was dragonsbreath. If the dragons are breathing, doesn’t that mean they 
are coming to life?”
The red woman, Maester Cressen thought sourly. Ill enough

that she’s filled the head of the mother with her madness, must she poison the 
daughter’s dreams as well? He would have a stern word with Dalla, warn her 
not to spread such tales. “The thing in the sky is a comet, sweet child. A 
star with a tail, lost in the heavens. It will be gone soon enough, never to be 
seen again in our lifetimes. Watch and see.”
Shireen gave a brave little nod. “Mother said the white raven means it’s not 
summer anymore.”
“That is so, my lady. The white ravens fly only from the Citadel.” Cressen’s 
fingers went to the chain about his neck, each link forged from a different 
metal, each symbolizing his mastery of another branch of learning; the 
maester’s collar, mark of his order. In the pride of his youth, he had worn it 
easily, but now it seemed heavy to him, the metal cold against his skin. “They 
are larger than other ravens, and more clever, bred to carry only the most 
important messages. This one came to tell us that the Conclave has met, 
considered the reports and measurements made by maesters all over the realm, 
and declared this great summer done at last. Ten years, two turns, and sixteen 
days it lasted, the longest summer in living memory.”
“Will it get cold now?” Shireen was a summer child, and had never known true 
cold.
“In time,” Cressen replied. “If the gods are good, they will grant us a warm 
autumn and bountiful harvests, so we might prepare for the winter to come.” 
The smallfolk said that a long summer meant an even longer winter, but the 
maester saw no reason

to frighten the child with such tales.
Patchface rang his bells. “It is always summer under the sea,” he 
intoned. “The merwives wear nennymoans in their hair and weave gowns of silver 
seaweed. I know, I know, oh, oh, oh.”
Shireen giggled. “I should like a gown of silver seaweed.”
“Under the sea, it snows up,” said the fool, “and the rain is dry as bone. I 
know, I know, oh, oh, oh.”
“Will it truly snow?” the child asked.
“It will,” Cressen said. But not for years yet, I pray, and then not for 
long. “Ah, here is Pylos with the bird.”
Shireen gave a cry of delight. Even Cressen had to admit the bird made an 
impressive sight, white as snow and larger than any hawk, with the bright black 
eyes that meant it was no mere albino, but a truebred white raven of the 
Citadel. “Here,” he called. The raven spread its wings, leapt into the air, 
and flapped noisily across the room to land on the table beside him.
“I’ll see to your breakfast now,” Pylos announced. Cressen nodded. “This is 
the Lady Shireen,” he told the raven. The bird bobbed its pale head up and 
down, as if it were bowing. “Lady,” it croaked. 
“Lady.”
The child’s mouth gaped open. “It talks!”
“A few words. As I said, they are clever, these birds.”
“Clever bird, clever man, clever clever fool,” said Patchface, jangling. 
“Oh, clever clever clever fool.” He began to sing. “The shadows come to 
dance, my lord, dance my lord, dance my lord,” he sang, hopping from one 
foot to the other and

back again. “The shadows come to stay, my lord, stay my lord, stay my 
lord.” He jerked his head with each word, the bells in his antlers 
sending up a clangor.
The white raven screamed and went flapping away to perch on the iron railing of 
the rookery stairs. Shireen seemed to grow smaller. “He sings that all the 
time. I told him to stop but he won’t. It makes me scared. Make him 
stop.”
And how do I do that? the old man wondered. Once I might have 
silenced him forever, but now . . .
Patchface had come to them as a boy. Lord Steffon of cherished memory had found 
him in Volantis, across the narrow sea. The king—the old king, Aerys II 
Targaryen, who had not been quite so mad in those days—had sent his 
lordship to seek a bride for Prince Rhaegar, who had no sisters to wed. “We 
have found the most splendid fool,” he wrote Cressen, a fortnight before he 
was to return home from his fruitless mission. “Only a boy, yet nimble as a 
monkey and witty as a dozen courtiers. He juggles and riddles and does magic, 
and he can sing prettily in four tongues. We have bought his freedom and hope 
to bring him home with us. Robert will be delighted with him, and perhaps in 
time he will even teach Stannis how to laugh.”
It saddened Cressen to remember that letter. No one had ever taught Stannis how 
to laugh, least of all the boy Patchface. The storm came up suddenly, howling, 
and Shipbreaker Bay proved the truth of its name. The lord’s two-masted galley 
Windproud broke up within sight of his castle. From its parapets his 
two

eldest sons had watched as their father’s ship was smashed against the rocks 
and swallowed by the waters. A hundred oarsmen and sailors went down with Lord 
Steffon Baratheon and his lady wife, and for days thereafter every tide left a 
fresh crop of swollen corpses on the strand below Storm’s End.
The boy washed up on the third day. Maester Cressen had come down with the 
rest, to help put names to the dead. When they found the fool he was naked, his 
skin white and wrinkled and powdered with wet sand. Cressen had thought him 
another corpse, but when Jommy grabbed his ankles to drag him off to the burial 
wagon, the boy coughed water and sat up. To his dying day, Jommy had sworn that 
Patchface’s flesh was clammy cold.
No one ever explained those two days the fool had been lost in the sea. The 
fisherfolk liked to say a mermaid had taught him to breathe water in return for 
his seed. Patchface himself had said nothing. The witty, clever lad that Lord 
Steffon had written of never reached Storm’s End; the boy they found was 
someone else, broken in body and mind, hardly capable of speech, much less of 
wit. Yet his fool’s face left no doubt of who he was. It was the fashion in the 
Free City of Volantis to tattoo the faces of slaves and servants; from neck to 
scalp the boy’s skin had been patterned in squares of red and green 
motley.
“The wretch is mad, and in pain, and no use to anyone, least of all himself,” 
declared old Ser Harbert, the castellan of Storm’s End in those years. “The 
kindest thing you could do for that one is fill his cup with the milk of the 
poppy. A painless

sleep, and there’s an end to it. He’d bless you if he had the wit for it.” But 
Cressen had refused, and in the end he had won. Whether Patchface had gotten 
any joy of that victory he could not say, not even today, so many years 
later.
“The shadows come to dance, my lord, dance my lord, dance my lord,” 
the fool sang on, swinging his head and making his bells clang and clatter. 
Bong dong, ring-a-ling, bong dong.
“Lord,” the white raven shrieked. “Lord, lord, 
lord.”
“A fool sings what he will,” the maester told his anxious princess. “You 
must not take his words to heart. On the morrow he may remember another song, 
and this one will never be heard again.” He can sing prettily in four 
tongues, Lord Steffon had written . . .
Pylos strode through the door. “Maester, pardons.”
“You have forgotten the porridge,” Cressen said, amused. That was most unlike 
Pylos.
“Maester, Ser Davos returned last night. They were talking of it in the 
kitchen. I thought you would want to know at once.”
“Davos . . . last night, you say? Where is he?”
“With the king. They have been together most of the night.”
There was a time when Lord Stannis would have woken him, no matter the hour, to 
have him there to give his counsel. “I should have been told,” Cressen 
complained. “I should have been woken.” He disentangled his fingers from 
Shireen’s. “Pardons, my lady, but I must speak with your lord father. Pylos, 
give me your arm. There are too many steps in this castle, and it seems to me 
they

add a few every night, just to vex me.”
Shireen and Patchface followed them out, but the child soon grew restless with 
the old man’s creeping pace and dashed ahead, the fool lurching after her with 
his cowbells clanging madly.
Castles are not friendly places for the frail, Cressen was reminded as he 
descended the turnpike stairs of Sea Dragon Tower. Lord Stannis would be found 
in the Chamber of the Painted Table, atop the Stone Drum, Dragonstone’s central 
keep, so named for the way its ancient walls boomed and rumbled during storms. 
To reach him they must cross the gallery, pass through the middle and inner 
walls with their guardian gargoyles and black iron gates, and ascend more steps 
than Cressen cared to contemplate. Young men climbed steps two at a time; for 
old men with bad hips, every one was a torment. But Lord Stannis would not 
think to come to him, so the maester resigned himself to the ordeal. He had 
Pylos to help him, at the least, and for that he was grateful.
Shuffling along the gallery, they passed before a row of tall arched windows 
with commanding views of the outer bailey, the curtain wall, and the fishing 
village beyond. In the yard, archers were firing at practice butts to the call 
of “Notch, draw, loose.” Their arrows made a sound like a flock of birds 
taking wing. Guardsmen strode the wallwalks, peering between the gargoyles on 
the host camped without. The morning air was hazy with the smoke of cookfires, 
as three thousand men sat down to break their fasts beneath the banners of 
their lords. Past the sprawl of the camp, the anchorage was crowded with ships. 
No

craft that had come within sight of Dragonstone this past half year had been 
allowed to leave again. Lord Stannis’s Fury, a triple-decked war 
galley of three hundred oars, looked almost small beside some of the 
big-bellied carracks and cogs that surrounded her.
The guardsmen outside the Stone Drum knew the maesters by sight, and passed 
them through. “Wait here,” Cressen told Pylos, within. “It’s best I see him 
alone.”
“It is a long climb, Maester.”
Cressen smiled. “You think I have forgotten? I have climbed these steps so 
often I know each one by name.”
Halfway up, he regretted his decision. He had stopped to catch his breath and 
ease the pain in his hip when he heard the scuff of boots on stone, and came 
face-to-face with Ser Davos Seaworth, descending.
Davos was a slight man, his low birth written plain upon a common face. A 
well-worn green cloak, stained by salt and spray and faded from the sun, draped 
his thin shoulders, over brown doublet and breeches that matched brown eyes and 
hair. About his neck a pouch of worn leather hung from a thong. His small beard 
was well peppered with grey, and he wore a leather glove on his maimed left 
hand. When he saw Cressen, he checked his descent.
“Ser Davos,” the maester said. “When did you return?”
“In the black of morning. My favorite time.” It was said that no one had ever 
handled a ship by night half so well as Davos Shorthand. Before Lord Stannis 
had knighted him, he had been the

most notorious and elusive smuggler in all the Seven Kingdoms.
“And?”
The man shook his head. “It is as you warned him. They will not rise, Maester. 
Not for him. They do not love him.”
No, Cressen thought. Nor will they ever. He is strong, able, 
just . . . aye, just past the point of 
wisdom . . . yet it is not enough. It has never been 
enough. “You spoke to them all?”
“All? No. Only those that would see me. They do not love me either, these 
highborns. To them I’ll always be the Onion Knight.” His left hand closed, 
stubby fingers locking into a fist; Stannis had hacked the ends off at the last 
joint, all but the thumb. “I broke bread with Gulian Swann and old Penrose, 
and the Tarths consented to a midnight meeting in a grove. The 
others—well, Beric Dondarrion is gone missing, some say dead, and Lord 
Caron is with Renly. Bryce the Orange, of the Rainbow Guard.”
“The Rainbow Guard?”
“Renly’s made his own Kingsguard,” the onetime smuggler explained, “but 
these seven don’t wear white. Each one has his own color. Loras Tyrell’s their 
Lord Commander.”It was just the sort of notion that would appeal to Renly Baratheon; a 
splendid new order of knighthood, with gorgeous new raiment to proclaim it. 
Even as a boy, Renly had loved bright colors and rich fabrics, and he had loved 
his games as well. “Look at me!” he would shout as he ran laughing through 
the halls of Storm’s End. “Look at me, I’m a dragon,” or “Look at me, I’m a 
wizard,” or “Look at me, look at me, I’m the rain god.”
The bold little boy with wild black hair and laughing eyes was a man grown now, 
one-and-twenty, and still he played his games. Look at me, I’m a 
king, Cressen thought sadly. Oh, Renly, Renly, dear sweet child, do 
you know what you are doing? And would you care if you did? Is there anyone who 
cares for him but me? “What reasons did the lords give for their 
refusals?” he asked Ser Davos.“Well, as to that, some gave me soft words and some blunt, some made 
excuses, some promises, some only lied.” He shrugged. “In the end words are 
just wind.”
“You could bring him no hope?”
“Only the false sort, and I’d not do that,” Davos said. “He had the truth 
from me.”
Maester Cressen remembered the day Davos had been knighted, after the siege of 
Storm’s End. Lord Stannis and a small garrison had held the castle for close to 
a year, against the great host of the Lords Tyrell and Redwyne. Even the sea 
was closed against them, watched day and night by Redwyne galleys flying the 
burgundy banners of the Arbor. Within Storm’s End, the horses had long since 
been eaten, the dogs and cats were gone, and the garrison was down to roots and 
rats. Then came a night when the moon was new and black clouds hid the stars. 
Cloaked in that darkness, Davos the smuggler had dared the Redwyne cordon and 
the rocks of Shipbreaker Bay alike. His little ship had a black hull, black 
sails, black oars, and a hold crammed with onions and salt fish. Little enough, 
yet it had kept the garrison alive long enough for Eddard Stark to reach 
Storm’s End and break the siege.
Lord Stannis had rewarded Davos with choice lands on Cape Wrath, a small keep, 
and a knight’s honors . . . but he had also decreed that he 
lose a joint of each finger on his left hand, to pay for all his years of 
smuggling. Davos had submitted, on the condition that Stannis wield the knife 
himself; he would accept no punishment from lesser hands. The lord had used a 
butcher’s

cleaver, the better to cut clean and true. Afterward, Davos had chosen the name 
Seaworth for his new-made house, and he took for his banner a black ship on a 
pale grey field—with an onion on its sails. The onetime smuggler was 
fond of saying that Lord Stannis had done him a boon, by giving him four less 
fingernails to clean and trim.
No, Cressen thought, a man like that would give no false hope, nor soften a 
hard truth. “Ser Davos, truth can be a bitter draught, even for a man like 
Lord Stannis. He thinks only of returning to King’s Landing in the fullness of 
his power, to tear down his enemies and claim what is rightfully his. Yet 
now . . .”
“If he takes this meager host to King’s Landing, it will be only to die. He 
does not have the numbers. I told him as much, but you know his pride.” Davos 
held up his gloved hand. “My fingers will grow back before that man bends to 
sense.”
The old man sighed. “You have done all you could. Now I must add my voice to 
yours.” Wearily, he resumed his climb.
Lord Stannis Baratheon’s refuge was a great round room with walls of bare black 
stone and four tall narrow windows that looked out to the four points of the 
compass. In the center of the chamber was the great table from which it took 
its name, a massive slab of carved wood fashioned at the command of Aegon 
Targaryen in the days before the Conquest. The Painted Table was more than 
fifty feet long, perhaps half that wide at its widest point, but less than four 
feet across at its narrowest. Aegon’s carpenters had shaped it after the land 
of Westeros, sawing out each bay and

peninsula until the table nowhere ran straight. On its surface, darkened by 
near three hundred years of varnish, were painted the Seven Kingdoms as they 
had been in Aegon’s day; rivers and mountains, castles and cities, lakes and 
forests.
There was a single chair in the room, carefully positioned in the precise place 
that Dragonstone occupied off the coast of Westeros, and raised up to give a 
good view of the tabletop. Seated in the chair was a man in a tight-laced 
leather jerkin and breeches of roughspun brown wool. When Maester Cressen 
entered, he glanced up. “I knew you would come, old man, whether I 
summoned you or no.” There was no hint of warmth in his voice; there seldom 
was.
Stannis Baratheon, Lord of Dragonstone and by the grace of the gods rightful 
heir to the Iron Throne of the Seven Kingdoms of Westeros, was broad of 
shoulder and sinewy of limb, with a tightness to his face and flesh that spoke 
of leather cured in the sun until it was as tough as steel. Hard was 
the word men used when they spoke of Stannis, and hard he was. Though he was 
not yet five-and-thirty, only a fringe of thin black hair remained on his head, 
circling behind his ears like the shadow of a crown. His brother, the late King 
Robert, had grown a beard in his final years. Maester Cressen had never seen 
it, but they said it was a wild thing, thick and fierce. As if in answer, 
Stannis kept his own whiskers cropped tight and short. They lay like a 
blue-black shadow across his square jaw and the bony hollows of his cheeks. His 
eyes were open wounds beneath his heavy brows, a blue as dark

as the sea by night. His mouth would have given despair to even the drollest of 
fools; it was a mouth made for frowns and scowls and sharply worded commands, 
all thin pale lips and clenched muscles, a mouth that had forgotten how to 
smile and had never known how to laugh. Sometimes when the world grew very 
still and silent of a night, Maester Cressen fancied he could hear Lord Stannis 
grinding his teeth half a castle away.
“Once you would have woken me,” the old man said.
“Once you were young. Now you are old and sick, and need your sleep.” Stannis 
had never learned to soften his speech, to dissemble or flatter; he said what 
he thought, and those that did not like it could be damned. “I knew you’d 
learn what Davos had to say soon enough. You always do, don’t you?”
“I would be of no help to you if I did not,” Cressen said. “I met Davos on 
the stair.”
“And he told all, I suppose? I should have had the man’s tongue shortened 
along with his fingers.”
“He would have made you a poor envoy then.”
“He made me a poor envoy in any case. The storm lords will not rise for me. It 
seems they do not like me, and the justice of my cause means nothing to them. 
The cravenly ones will sit behind their walls waiting to see how the wind rises 
and who is likely to triumph. The bold ones have already declared for Renly. 
For Renly!” He spat out the name like poison on his 
tongue.
“Your brother has been the Lord of Storm’s End these past thirteen years. 
These lords are his sworn bannermen—”“His,” Stannis broke in, “when by rights they should be 
mine. I never asked for Dragonstone. I never wanted it. I took it because 
Robert’s enemies were here and he commanded me to root them out. I built his 
fleet and did his work, dutiful as a younger brother should be to an elder, as 
Renly should be to me. And what was Robert’s thanks? He names me Lord of 
Dragonstone, and gives Storm’s End and its incomes to Renly. Storm’s 
End belonged to House Baratheon for three hundred years; by rights it should 
have passed to me when Robert took the Iron Throne.”
It was an old grievance, deeply felt, and never more so than now. Here was the 
heart of his lord’s weakness; for Dragonstone, old and strong though it was, 
commanded the allegiance of only a handful of lesser lords, whose stony island 
holdings were too thinly peopled to yield up the men that Stannis needed. Even 
with the sellswords he had brought across the narrow sea from the Free Cities 
of Myr and Lys, the host camped outside his walls was far too small to bring 
down the power of House Lannister.
“Robert did you an injustice,” Maester Cressen replied carefully, “yet he 
had sound reasons. Dragonstone had long been the seat of House Targaryen. He 
needed a man’s strength to rule here, and Renly was but a child.”
“He is a child still,” Stannis declared, his anger ringing loud in the empty 
hall, “a thieving child who thinks to snatch the crown off my brow. What has 
Renly ever done to earn a throne? He sits in council and jests with 
Littlefinger, and at tourneys he dons his splendid suit of armor and allows 
himself to be knocked

off his horse by a better man. That is the sum of my brother Renly, who thinks 
he ought to be a king. I ask you, why did the gods inflict me with 
brothers?”
“I cannot answer for the gods.”
“You seldom answer at all these days, it seems to me. Who maesters for Renly? 
Perchance I should send for him, I might like his counsel better. What do you 
think this maester said when my brother decided to steal my crown? What counsel 
did your colleague offer to this traitor blood of mine?”
“It would surprise me if Lord Renly sought counsel, Your Grace.” The youngest 
of Lord Steffon’s three sons had grown into a man bold but heedless, who acted 
from impulse rather than calculation. In that, as in so much else, Renly was 
like his brother Robert, and utterly unlike Stannis.
“Your Grace,” Stannis repeated bitterly. “You
mock me with a 
king’s style, yet what am I king of? Dragonstone and a few rocks in the narrow 
sea, there is my kingdom.” He descended the steps of his chair to stand before 
the table, his shadow falling across the mouth of the Blackwater Rush and the 
painted forest where King’s Landing now stood. There he stood, brooding over 
the realm he sought to claim, so near at hand and yet so far away. “Tonight I 
am to sup with my lords bannermen, such as they are. Celtigar, Velaryon, Bar 
Emmon, the whole paltry lot of them. A poor crop, if truth be told, but they 
are what my brothers have left me. That Lysene pirate Salladhor Saan will be 
there with the latest tally of what I owe him, and Morosh the Myrman will 
caution

me with talk of tides and autumn gales, while Lord Sunglass mutters piously of 
the will of the Seven. Celtigar will want to know which storm lords are joining 
us. Velaryon will threaten to take his levies home unless we strike at once. 
What am I to tell them? What must I do now?”
“Your true enemies are the Lannisters, my lord,” Maester Cressen answered. 
“If you and your brother were to make common cause against 
them—”
“I will not treat with Renly,” Stannis answered in a tone that brooked no 
argument. “Not while he calls himself a king.”
“Not Renly, then,” the maester yielded. His lord was stubborn and proud; when 
he had set his mind, there was no changing it. “Others might serve your needs 
as well. Eddard Stark’s son has been proclaimed King in the North, with all the 
power of Winterfell and Riverrun behind him.”
“A green boy,” said Stannis, “and another false king. Am I to accept a 
broken realm?”
“Surely half a kingdom is better than none,” Cressen said, “and if you help 
the boy avenge his father’s murder—”
“Why should I avenge Eddard Stark? The man was nothing to me. Oh, 
Robert loved him, to be sure. Loved him as a brother, how often did I 
hear that? I was his brother, not Ned Stark, but you would never have 
known it by the way he treated me. I held Storm’s End for him, watching good 
men starve while Mace Tyrell and Paxter Redwyne feasted within sight of my 
walls. Did Robert thank me? No. He thanked Stark, for lifting the 
siege when we

were down to rats and radishes. I built a fleet at Robert’s command, took 
Dragonstone in his name. Did he take my hand and say, Well done, brother, 
whatever should I do without you? No, he blamed me for letting Willem 
Darry steal away Viserys and the babe, as if I could have stopped it. I sat on 
his council for fifteen years, helping Jon Arryn rule his realm while Robert 
drank and whored, but when Jon died, did my brother name me his Hand? No, he 
went galloping off to his dear friend Ned Stark, and offered him the honor. And 
small good it did either of them.”
“Be that as it may, my lord,” Maester Cressen said gently. “Great wrongs 
have been done you, but the past is dust. The future may yet be won if you join 
with the Starks. There are others you might sound out as well. What of Lady 
Arryn? If the queen murdered her husband, surely she will want justice for him. 
She has a young son, Jon Arryn’s heir. If you were to betroth Shireen to 
him—”
“The boy is weak and sickly,” Lord Stannis objected. “Even his father saw 
how it was, when he asked me to foster him on Dragonstone. Service as a page 
might have done him good, but that damnable Lannister woman had Lord Arryn 
poisoned before it could be done, and now Lysa hides him in the Eyrie. She’ll 
never part with the boy, I promise you that.”
“Then you must send Shireen to the Eyrie,” the maester urged. “Dragonstone 
is a grim home for a child. Let her fool go with her, so she will have a 
familiar face about her.”
“Familiar and hideous.” Stannis furrowed his brow in

thought. “Still . . . perhaps it is worth the 
trying . . .”
“Must the rightful Lord of the Seven Kingdoms beg for help from widow women 
and usurpers?” a woman’s voice asked sharply.
Maester Cressen turned, and bowed his head. “My lady,” he said, chagrined 
that he had not heard her enter.
Lord Stannis scowled. “I do not beg. Of anyone. Mind you remember that, 
woman.”
“I am pleased to hear it, my lord.” Lady Selyse was as tall as her husband, 
thin of body and thin of face, with prominent ears, a sharp nose, and the 
faintest hint of a mustache on her upper lip. She plucked it daily and cursed 
it regularly, yet it never failed to return. Her eyes were pale, her mouth 
stern, her voice a whip. She cracked it now. “Lady Arryn owes you her 
allegiance, as do the Starks, your brother Renly, and all the rest. You are 
their one true king. It would not be fitting to plead and bargain with them for 
what is rightfully yours by the grace of god.”
God, she said, not gods. The red woman had won her, heart 
and soul, turning her from the gods of the Seven Kingdoms, both old and new, to 
worship the one they called the Lord of Light.
“Your god can keep his grace,” said Lord Stannis, who did not share his 
wife’s fervent new faith. “It’s swords I need, not blessings. Do you have an 
army hidden somewhere that you’ve not told me of?” There was no affection in 
his tone. Stannis had always been uncomfortable around women, even his own 
wife. When he had gone to King’s Landing to sit on Robert’s council, he had

left Selyse on Dragonstone with their daughter. His letters had been few, his 
visits fewer; he did his duty in the marriage bed once or twice a year, but 
took no joy in it, and the sons he had once hoped for had never come.
“My brothers and uncles and cousins have armies,” she told him. “House 
Florent will rally to your banner.”
“House Florent can field two thousand swords at best.” It was said that 
Stannis knew the strength of every house in the Seven Kingdoms. “And you have 
a deal more faith in your brothers and uncles than I do, my lady. The Florent 
lands lie too close to Highgarden for your lord uncle to risk Mace Tyrell’s 
wrath.”
“There is another way.” Lady Selyse moved closer. “Look out your windows, my 
lord. There is the sign you have waited for, blazoned on the sky. Red, it is, 
the red of flame, red for the fiery heart of the true god. It is his 
banner—and yours! See how it unfurls across the heavens like a dragon’s 
hot breath, and you the Lord of Dragonstone. It means your time has come, Your 
Grace. Nothing is more certain. You are meant to sail from this desolate rock 
as Aegon the Conqueror once sailed, to sweep all before you as he did. Only say 
the word, and embrace the power of the Lord of Light.”
“How many swords will the Lord of Light put into my hand?” Stannis demanded 
again.
“All you need,” his wife promised. “The swords of Storm’s End and Highgarden 
for a start, and all their lords bannermen.”
“Davos would tell you different,” Stannis said. “Those

swords are sworn to Renly. They love my charming young brother, as they once 
loved Robert . . . and as they have never loved me.”
“Yes,” she answered, “but if Renly should die . . .”
Stannis looked at his lady with narrowed eyes, until Cressen could not hold his 
tongue. “It is not to be thought. Your Grace, whatever follies Renly has 
committed—”
“Follies? I call them treasons.” Stannis turned back to his wife. 
“My brother is young and strong, and he has a vast host around him, and these 
rainbow knights of his.”
“Melisandre has gazed into the flames, and seen him dead.”
Cressen was horrorstruck. “Fratricide . . . my lord, this is 
evil, unthinkable . . . please, listen to 
me.”
Lady Selyse gave him a measured look. “And what will you tell him, Maester? 
How he might win half a kingdom if he goes to the Starks on his knees and sells 
our daughter to Lysa Arryn?”
“I have heard your counsel, Cressen,” Lord Stannis said. “Now I will hear 
hers. You are dismissed.”
Maester Cressen bent a stiff knee. He could feel Lady Selyse’s eyes on his back 
as he shuffled slowly across the room. By the time he reached the bottom of the 
steps it was all he could do to stand erect. “Help me,” he said to 
Pylos.
When he was safe back in his own rooms, Cressen sent the younger man away and 
limped to his balcony once more, to stand between his gargoyles and stare out 
to sea. One of Salladhor Saan’s warships was sweeping past the castle, her 
gaily striped hull slicing through the grey-green waters as her oars rose and

fell. He watched until she vanished behind a headland. Would that my fears 
could vanish so easily. Had he lived so long for this?
When a maester donned his collar, he put aside the hope of children, yet 
Cressen had oft felt a father nonetheless. Robert, Stannis, 
Renly . . . three sons he had raised after the angry sea 
claimed Lord Steffon. Had he done so ill that now he must watch one kill the 
other? He could not allow it, would not allow it.
The woman was the heart of it. Not the Lady Selyse, the other one. 
The red woman, the servants had named her, afraid to speak her name. “I will 
speak her name,” Cressen told his stone hellhound. “Melisandre. 
Her.” Melisandre of Asshai, sorceress, shadowbinder, and priestess 
to R’hllor, the Lord of Light, the Heart of Fire, the God of Flame and Shadow. 
Melisandre, whose madness must not be allowed to spread beyond 
Dragonstone.
His chambers seemed dim and gloomy after the brightness of the morning. With 
fumbling hands, the old man lit a candle and carried it to the workroom beneath 
the rookery stair, where his ointments, potions, and medicines stood neatly on 
their shelves. On the bottom shelf behind a row of salves in squat clay jars he 
found a vial of indigo glass, no larger than his little finger. It rattled when 
he shook it. Cressen blew away a layer of dust and carried it back to his 
table. Collapsing into his chair, he pulled the stopper and spilled out the 
vial’s contents. A dozen crystals, no larger than seeds, rattled across the 
parchment he’d

been reading. They shone like jewels in the candlelight, so purple that the 
maester found himself thinking that he had never truly seen the color 
before.
The chain around his throat felt very heavy. He touched one of the crystals 
lightly with the tip of his little finger. Such a small thing to hold the 
power of life and death. It was made from a certain plant that grew only 
on the islands of the Jade Sea, half a world away. The leaves had to be aged, 
and soaked in a wash of limes and sugar water and certain rare spices from the 
Summer Isles. Afterward they could be discarded, but the potion must be 
thickened with ash and allowed to crystallize. The process was slow and 
difficult, the necessaries costly and hard to acquire. The alchemists of Lys 
knew the way of it, though, and the Faceless Men of 
Braavos . . . and the maesters of his order as well, though it 
was not something talked about beyond the walls of the Citadel. All the world 
knew that a maester forged his silver link when he learned the art of 
healing—but the world preferred to forget that men who knew how to heal 
also knew how to kill.
Cressen no longer recalled the name the Asshai’i gave the leaf, or the Lysene 
poisoners the crystal. In the
Citadel, it was simply called the strangler. 
Dissolved in wine, it would make the muscles of a man’s throat clench tighter 
than any fist, shutting off his windpipe. They said a victim’s face turned as 
purple as the little crystal seed from which his death was grown, but so too 
did a man choking on a morsel of food.
And this very night Lord Stannis would feast his bannermen,

his lady wife . . . and the red woman, Melisandre of 
Asshai.
I must rest, Maester Cressen told himself. I must have all my 
strength come dark. My hands must not shake, nor my courage flag. It is a 
dreadful thing I do, yet it must be done. If there are gods, surely they will 
forgive me. He had slept so poorly of late. A nap would refresh him for 
the ordeal ahead. Wearily, he tottered off to his bed. Yet when he closed his 
eyes, he could still see the light of the comet, red and fiery and vividly 
alive amidst the darkness of his dreams. Perhaps it is my comet, he 
thought drowsily at the last, just before sleep took him. An omen of 
blood, foretelling 
murder . . . yes . . .
When he woke it was full dark, his bedchamber was black, and every joint in his 
body ached. Cressen pushed himself up, his head throbbing. Clutching for his 
cane, he rose unsteady to his feet. So late, he thought. They 
did not summon me. He was always summoned for feasts, seated near the 
salt, close to Lord Stannis. His lord’s face swam up before him, not the man he 
was but the boy he had been, standing cold in the shadows while the sun shone 
on his elder brother. Whatever he did, Robert had done first, and better. Poor 
boy . . . he must hurry, for his sake.
The maester found the crystals where he had left them, and scooped them off the 
parchment. Cressen owned no hollow rings, such as the poisoners of Lys were 
said to favor, but a myriad of pockets great and small were sewn inside the 
loose sleeves of his robe. He secreted the strangler seeds in one of them, 
threw open his door, and called, “Pylos? Where are you?” When he heard no

reply, he called again, louder. “Pylos, I need help.” Still there came no 
answer. That was queer; the young maester had his cell only a half turn down 
the stair, within easy earshot.
In the end, Cressen had to shout for the servants. “Make haste,” he told 
them. “I have slept too long. They will be feasting by 
now . . . drinking . . . I should have been 
woken.” What had happened to Maester Pylos? Truly, he did not 
understand.
Again he had to cross the long gallery. A night wind whispered through the 
great windows, sharp with the smell of the sea. Torches flickered along the 
walls of Dragonstone, and in the camp beyond, he could see hundreds of 
cookfires burning, as if a field of stars had fallen to the earth. Above, the 
comet blazed red and malevolent. I am too old and wise to fear such 
things, the maester told himself.
The doors to the Great Hall were set in the mouth of a stone dragon. He told 
the servants to leave him outside. It would be better to enter alone; he must 
not appear feeble. Leaning heavily on his cane, Cressen climbed the last few 
steps and hobbled beneath the gateway teeth. A pair of guardsmen opened the 
heavy red doors before him, unleashing a sudden blast of noise and light. 
Cressen stepped down into the dragon’s maw.
Over the clatter of knife and plate and the low mutter of table talk, he heard 
Patchface singing, “. . . dance, my lord, dance my 
lord,” to the accompaniment of jangling cowbells. The same dreadful song 
he’d sung this morning. “The shadows come to stay, my lord, stay my lord, 
stay my lord.” The lower tables were

crowded with knights, archers, and sellsword captains, tearing apart loaves of 
black bread to soak in their fish stew. Here there was no loud laughter, no 
raucous shouting such as marred the dignity of other men’s feasts; Lord Stannis 
did not permit such.
Cressen made his way toward the raised platform where the lords sat with the 
king. He had to step wide around Patchface. Dancing, his bells ringing, the 
fool neither saw nor heard his approach. As he hopped from one leg to the 
other, Patchface lurched into Cressen, knocking his cane out from under him. 
They went crashing down together amidst the rushes in a tangle of arms and legs, 
while a sudden gale of laughter went up around them. No doubt it was a comical 
sight.
Patchface sprawled half on top of him, motley fool’s face pressed close to his 
own. He had lost his tin helm with its antlers and bells. “Under the sea, you 
fall up,” he declared. “I know, I know, oh, oh, oh.” Giggling, the 
fool rolled off, bounded to his feet, and did a little dance.
Trying to make the best of it, the maester smiled feebly and struggled to rise, 
but his hip was in such pain that for a moment he was half afraid that he had 
broken it all over again. He felt strong hands grasp him under the arms and 
lift him back to his feet. “Thank you, ser,” he murmured, turning to see 
which knight had come to his aid . . .
“Maester,” said Lady Melisandre, her deep voice flavored with the music of 
the Jade Sea. “You ought take more care.” As ever, she wore red head to heel, 
a long loose gown of flowing silk

as bright as fire, with dagged sleeves and deep slashes in the bodice that 
showed glimpses of a darker bloodred fabric beneath. Around her throat was a 
red gold choker tighter than any maester’s chain, ornamented with a single 
great ruby. Her hair was not the orange or strawberry color of common 
red-haired men, but a deep burnished copper that shone in the light of the 
torches. Even her eyes were red . . . but her skin was smooth 
and white, unblemished, pale as cream. Slender she was, graceful, taller than 
most knights, with full breasts and narrow waist and a heart-shaped face. Men’s 
eyes that once found her did not quickly look away, not even a maester’s eyes. 
Many called her beautiful. She was not beautiful. She was red, and terrible, 
and red.
“I . . . thank you, my lady.”
“A man your age must look to where he steps,” Melisandre said courteously. 
“The night is dark and full of terrors.”
He knew the phrase, some prayer of her faith. It makes no matter, I have a 
faith of my own. “Only children fear the dark,” he told her. Yet even as 
he said the words, he heard Patchface take up his song again. “The 
shadows come to dance, my lord, dance my lord, dance my lord.”
“Now here is a riddle,” Melisandre said. “A clever fool and a foolish wise 
man.” Bending, she picked up Patchface’s helm from where it had fallen and set 
it on Cressen’s head. The cowbells rang softly as the tin bucket slid down over 
his ears. “A crown

to match your chain, Lord Maester,” she announced. All around them, men were 
laughing.
Cressen pressed his lips together and fought to still his rage. She thought he 
was feeble and helpless, but she would learn otherwise before the night was 
done. Old he might be, yet he was still a maester of the Citadel. “I need no 
crown but truth,” he told her, removing the fool’s helm from his 
head.
“There are truths in this world that are not taught at Oldtown.” Melisandre 
turned from him in a swirl of red silk and made her way back to the high table, 
where King Stannis and his queen were seated. Cressen handed the antlered tin 
bucket back to Patchface, and made to follow.
Maester Pylos sat in his place.
The old man could only stop and stare. “Maester
Pylos,” he said at last. 
“You . . . you did not wake me.”
“His Grace commanded me to let you rest.” Pylos had at least the grace to 
blush. “He told me you were not needed here.”
Cressen looked over the knights and captains and lords sitting silent. Lord 
Celtigar, aged and sour, wore a mantle patterned with red crabs picked out in 
garnets. Handsome Lord Velaryon chose sea-green silk, the white gold seahorse 
at his throat matching his long fair hair. Lord Bar Emmon, that plump boy of 
fourteen, was swathed in purple velvet trimmed with white seal, Ser Axell 
Florent remained homely even in russet and fox fur, pious Lord Sunglass wore 
moonstones at throat and wrist and finger, and the Lysene captain Salladhor 
Saan was a sunburst of

scarlet satin, gold, and jewels. Only Ser Davos dressed simply, in brown 
doublet and green wool mantle, and only Ser Davos met his gaze, with pity in 
his eyes.
“You are too ill and too confused to be of use to me, old man.” It sounded so 
like Lord Stannis’s voice, but it could not be, it could not. “Pylos will 
counsel me henceforth. Already he works with the ravens, since you can no 
longer climb to the rookery. I will not have you kill yourself in my 
service.”
Maester Cressen blinked. Stannis, my lord, my sad sullen boy, son I never 
had, you must not do this, don’t you know how I have cared for you, lived for 
you, loved you despite all? Yes, loved you, better than Robert even, or Renly, 
for you were the one unloved, the one who needed me most. Yet all he said 
was, “As you command, my lord, but . . . but I am hungry. 
Might not I have a place at your table?” At your side, I belong at your 
side . . .
Ser Davos rose from the bench. “I should be honored if the maester would sit 
here beside me, Your Grace.”
“As you will.” Lord Stannis turned away to say something to Melisandre, who 
had seated herself at his right hand, in the place of high honor. Lady Selyse 
was on his left, flashing a smile as bright and brittle as her 
jewels.
Too far, Cressen thought dully, looking at where Ser Davos was 
seated. Half of the lords bannermen were between the smuggler and the high 
table. I must be closer to her if I am to get the strangler into her cup, 
yet how?
Patchface was capering about as the maester made his slow

way around the table to Davos Seaworth. “Here we eat fish,” the fool declared 
happily, waving a cod about like a scepter. “Under the sea, the fish eat us. I 
know, I know, oh, oh, oh.”
Ser Davos moved aside to make room on the bench. “We all should be in motley 
tonight,” he said gloomily as Cressen seated himself, “for this is fool’s 
business we’re about. The red woman has seen victory in her flames, so Stannis 
means to press his claim, no matter what the numbers. Before she’s done we’re 
all like to see what Patchface saw, I fear—the bottom of the 
sea.”
Cressen slid his hands up into his sleeves as if for warmth. His fingers found 
the hard lumps the crystals made in the wool. “Lord Stannis.”
Stannis turned from the red woman, but it was Lady Selyse who replied. 
“King Stannis. You forget yourself, Maester.”
“He is old, his mind wanders,” the king told her gruffly. “What is it, 
Cressen? Speak your mind.”
“As you intend to sail, it is vital that you make common cause with Lord Stark 
and Lady Arryn . . .”
“I make common cause with no one,” Stannis Baratheon said.
“No more than light makes common cause with darkness.” Lady Selyse took his 
hand.
Stannis nodded. “The Starks seek to steal half my kingdom, even as the 
Lannisters have stolen my throne and my own sweet brother the swords and 
service and strongholds that are mine by rights. They are all usurpers, and 
they are all my enemies.”
I have lost him, Cressen thought, despairing. If only he
could somehow approach Melisandre unseen . . . he needed but an 
instant’s access to her cup. “You are the rightful heir to your brother 
Robert, the true Lord of the Seven Kingdoms, and King of the Andals, the 
Rhoynar, and the First Men,” he said desperately, “but even so, you cannot 
hope to triumph without allies.”
“He has an ally,” Lady Selyse said. “R’hllor, the Lord of Light, the Heart 
of Fire, the God of Flame and Shadow.”
“Gods make uncertain allies at best,” the old man insisted, “and 
that one has no power here.”
“You think not?” The ruby at Melisandre’s throat caught the light as she 
turned her head, and for an instant it seemed to glow bright as the comet. “If 
you will speak such folly, Maester, you ought to wear your crown 
again.”
“Yes,” Lady Selyse agreed. “Patches’s helm. It suits you well, old man. Put 
it on again, I command you.”
“Under the sea, no one wears hats,” Patchface said. “I know, I know, oh, oh, 
oh.”
Lord Stannis’s eyes were shadowed beneath his heavy brow, his mouth tight as 
his jaw worked silently. He always ground his teeth when he was angry. 
“Fool,” he growled at last, “my lady wife commands. Give Cressen your 
helm.”
No, the old maester thought, this is not you, not your way, you 
were always just, always hard yet never cruel, never, you did not understand 
mockery, no more than you understood laughter.
Patchface danced closer, his cowbells ringing, clang-a-lang, 
ding-ding, clink-clank-clink-clank. The maester sat silent

while the fool set the antlered bucket on his brow. Cressen bowed his head 
beneath the weight. His bells clanged. “Perhaps he ought sing his counsel 
henceforth,” Lady Selyse said.
“You go too far, woman,” Lord Stannis said. “He is an old man, and he’s 
served me well.”
And I will serve you to the last, my sweet lord, my poor lonely son, 
Cressen thought, for suddenly he saw the way. Ser Davos’s cup was before him, 
still half-full of sour red. He found a hard flake of crystal in his sleeve, 
held it tight between thumb and forefinger as he reached for the cup. 
Smooth motions, deft, I must not fumble now, he prayed, and the gods 
were kind. In the blink of an eye, his fingers were empty. His hands had not 
been so steady for years, nor half so fluid. Davos saw, but no one else, he was 
certain. Cup in hand, he rose to his feet. “Mayhaps I have been a fool. Lady 
Melisandre, will you share a cup of wine with me? A cup in honor of your god, 
your Lord of Light? A cup to toast his power?”
The red woman studied him. “If you wish.”
He could feel them all watching him. Davos clutched at him as he left the 
bench, catching his sleeve with the fingers that Lord Stannis had shortened. 
“What are you doing?” he whispered.
“A thing that must be done,” Maester Cressen answered, “for the sake of the 
realm, and the soul of my lord.” He shook off Davos’s hand, spilling a drop of 
wine on the rushes.
She met him beneath the high table with every man’s eyes upon them. But Cressen 
saw only her. Red silk, red eyes, the

ruby red at her throat, red lips curled in a faint smile as she put her hand 
atop his own, around the cup. Her skin felt hot, feverish. “It is not too late 
to spill the wine, Maester.”
“No,” he whispered hoarsely. “No.”
“As you will.” Melisandre of Asshai took the cup from his hands and drank 
long and deep. There was only half a swallow of wine remaining when she offered 
it back to him. “And now you.”
His hands were shaking, but he made himself be strong. A maester of the Citadel 
must not be afraid. The wine was sour on his tongue. He let the empty cup drop 
from his fingers to shatter on the floor. “He does have power here, 
my lord,” the woman said. “And fire cleanses.” At her throat, the ruby 
shimmered redly.
Cressen tried to reply, but his words caught in his throat. His cough became a 
terrible thin whistle as he strained to suck in air. Iron fingers tightened 
round his neck. As he sank to his knees, still he shook his head, denying her, 
denying her power, denying her magic, denying her god. And the cowbells peeled 
in his antlers, singing fool, fool, fool while the red woman looked 
down on him in pity, the candle flames dancing in her red red eyes.

The day was grey and bitter cold, and the dogs would  not take the scent.
The big black bitch had taken one sniff at the bear tracks, backed off, and skulked back to the pack with her tail between her legs. The dogs huddled together miserably on the riverbank as the wind snapped at them. Chett felt it too, biting through his layers of black wool and boiled leather. It was too bloody cold for man or beast, but here they were. His mouth twisted, and he could almost feel the boils that covered his cheeks and neck growing red and angry. I should be safe back at the Wall, tending the bloody ravens and making fires for old Maester Aemon. It was the bastard Jon Snow who had taken that from him, him and his fat friend Sam Tarly. It was their fault he was here, freezing his bloody balls off with a pack of hounds deep in the haunted forest.
“Seven hells.” He gave the leashes a hard yank to get the dogs’ attention. “Track, you bastards. That’s a bear print. You want some meat or no? Find!” But the hounds only huddled closer, whining. Chett snapped his short lash above their heads, and the black bitch snarled at him. “Dog meat would taste as good as bear,” he warned her, his breath frosting with every word.
Lark the Sisterman stood with his arms crossed over his chest and his hands tucked up into his armpits. He wore black wool gloves, but he was always complaining how his fingers were frozen. “It’s too bloody cold to hunt,” he said. “Bugger this bear, he’s not worth freezing over.”
“We can’t go back emptyhand, Lark,” rumbled Small Paul through the brown whiskers that covered most of his face. “The Lord Commander wouldn’t like that.” There was ice under the big man’s squashed pug nose, where his snot had frozen. A huge hand in a thick fur glove clenched tight around the shaft of a spear.
“Bugger that Old Bear too,” said the Sisterman, a thin man with sharp features and nervous eyes. “Mormont will be dead before daybreak, remember? Who cares what he likes?”
Small Paul blinked his black little eyes. Maybe he had forgotten, Chett thought; he was stupid enough to forget most anything. “Why do we have to kill the Old Bear? Why don’t we just go off and let him be?”
“You think he’ll let us be?” said Lark. “He’ll hunt us down. You want to be hunted, you great muttonhead?”
“No,” said Small Paul. “I don’t want that. I don’t.”
“So you’ll kill him?” said Lark.
“Yes.” The huge man stamped the butt of his spear on the frozen riverbank. “I will. He shouldn’t hunt us.”
The Sisterman took his hands from his armpits and turned to Chett. “We need to kill all the officers, I say.”
Chett was sick of hearing it. “We been over this. The Old Bear dies, and Blane from the Shadow Tower. Grubbs and Aethan as well, their ill luck for drawing the watch, Dywen and Bannen for their tracking, and Ser Piggy for the ravens. That’s all. We kill them quiet, while they sleep. One scream and we’re wormfood, every one of us.” His boils were red with rage. “Just do your bit and see that your cousins do theirs. And Paul, try and remember, it’s third watch, not second.”
“Third watch,” the big man said, through hair and frozen snot. “Me and Softfoot. I remember, Chett.”
The moon would be black tonight, and they had jiggered the watches so as to have eight of their own standing sentry, with two more guarding the horses. It wasn’t going to get much riper than that. Besides, the wildlings could be upon them any day now. Chett meant to be well away from here before that happened. He meant to live.
Three hundred sworn brothers of the Night’s Watch had ridden north, two hundred from Castle Black and another hundred from the Shadow Tower. It was the biggest ranging in living memory, near a third of the Watch’s strength. They meant to find Ben Stark, Ser Waymar Royce, and the other rangers who’d gone missing, and discover why the wildlings were leaving their villages. Well, they were no closer to Stark and Royce than when they’d left the Wall, but they’d learned where all the wildlings had gone—up into the icy heights of the godsforsaken Frostfangs. They could squat up there till the end of time and it wouldn’t prick Chett’s boils none.
But no. They were coming down. Down the Milkwater.
Chett raised his eyes and there it was. The river’s stony banks were bearded by ice, its pale milky waters flowing endlessly down out of the Frostfangs. And now Mance Rayder and his wildlings were flowing down the same way. Thoren Smallwood had returned in a lather three days past. While he was telling the Old Bear what his scouts had seen, his man Kedge Whiteye told the rest of them. “They’re still well up the foothills, but they’re coming,” Kedge said, warming his hands over the fire. “Harma the Dogshead has the van, the poxy bitch. Goady crept up on her camp and saw her plain by the fire. That fool Tumberjon wanted to pick her off with an arrow, but Smallwood had better sense.”
Chett spat. “How many were there, could you tell?”
“Many and more. Twenty, thirty thousand, we didn’t stay to count. Harma had five hundred in the van, every one ahorse.”
The men around the fire exchanged uneasy looks. It was a rare thing to find even a dozen mounted wildlings, and five hundred . . . 
“Smallwood sent Bannen and me wide around the van to catch a peek at the main body,” Kedge went on. “There was no end of them. They’re moving slow as a frozen river, four, five miles a day, but they don’t look like they mean to go back to their villages neither. More’n half were women and children, and they were driving their animals before them, goats, sheep, even aurochs dragging sledges. They’d loaded up with bales of fur and sides of meat, cages of chickens, butter churns and spinning wheels, every damn thing they own. The mules and garrons was so heavy laden you’d think their backs would break. The women as well.”
“And they follow the Milkwater?” Lark the Sisterman asked.
“I said so, didn’t I?”
The Milkwater would take them past the Fist of the First Men, the ancient ringfort where the Night’s Watch had made its camp. Any man with a thimble of sense could see that it was time to pull up stakes and fall back on the Wall. The Old Bear had strengthened the Fist with spikes and pits and caltrops, but against such a host all that was pointless. If they stayed here, they would be engulfed and overwhelmed.
And Thoren Smallwood wanted to attack. Sweet Donnel Hill was squire to Ser Mallador Locke, and the night before last Smallwood had come to Locke’s tent. Ser Mallador had been of the same mind as old Ser Ottyn Wythers, urging a retreat on the Wall, but Smallwood wanted to convince him otherwise. “This King-beyond-the-Wall will never look for us so far north,” Sweet Donnel reported him saying. “And this great host of his is a shambling horde, full of useless mouths who won’t know what end of a sword to hold. One blow will take all the fight out of them and send them howling back to their hovels for another fifty years.”
Three hundred against thirty thousand. Chett called that rank madness, and what was madder still was that Ser Mallador had been persuaded, and the two of them together were on the point of persuading the Old Bear. “If we wait too long, this chance may be lost, never to come again,” Smallwood was saying to anyone who would listen. Against that, Ser Ottyn Wythers said, “We are the shield that guards the realms of men. You do not throw away your shield for no good purpose,” but to that Thoren Smallwood said, “In a swordfight, a man’s surest defense is the swift stroke that slays his foe, not cringing behind a shield.”
Neither Smallwood nor Wythers had the command, though. Lord Mormont did, and Mormont was waiting for his other scouts, for Jarman Buckwell and the men who’d climbed the Giant’s Stair, and for Qhorin Halfhand and Jon Snow, who’d gone to probe the Skirling Pass. Buckwell and the Halfhand were late in returning, though. Dead, most like. Chett pictured Jon Snow lying blue and frozen on some bleak mountaintop with a wildling spear up his bastard’s arse. The thought made him smile. I hope they killed his bloody wolf as well.
“There’s no bear here,” he decided abruptly. “Just an old print, that’s all. Back to the Fist.” The dogs almost yanked him off his feet, as eager to get back as he was. Maybe they thought they were going to get fed. Chett had to laugh. He hadn’t fed them for three days now, to turn them mean and hungry. Tonight, before slipping off into the dark, he’d turn them loose among the horse lines, after Sweet Donnel Hill and Clubfoot Karl cut the tethers. They’ll have snarling hounds and panicked horses all over the Fist, running through fires, jumping the ringwall, and trampling down tents. With all the confusion, it might be hours before anyone noticed that fourteen brothers were missing.
Lark had wanted to bring in twice that number, but what could you expect from some stupid fishbreath Sisterman? Whisper a word in the wrong ear and before you knew it you’d be short a head. No, fourteen was a good number, enough to do what needed doing but not so many that they couldn’t keep the secret. Chett had recruited most of them himself. Small Paul was one of his; the strongest man on the Wall, even if he was slower than a dead snail. He’d once broken a wildling’s back with a hug. They had Dirk as well, named for his favorite weapon, and the little grey man the brothers called Softfoot, who’d raped a hundred women in his youth, and liked to boast how none had ever seen nor heard him until he shoved it up inside them.
The plan was Chett’s. He was the clever one; he’d been steward to old Maester Aemon for four good years before that bastard Jon Snow had done him out so his job could be handed to his fat pig of a friend. When he killed Sam Tarly tonight, he planned to whisper, “Give my love to Lord Snow,” right in his ear before he sliced Ser Piggy’s throat open to let the blood come bubbling out through all those layers of suet. Chett knew the ravens, so he wouldn’t have no trouble there, no more than he would with Tarly. One touch of the knife and that craven would piss his pants and start blubbering for his life. Let him beg, it won’t do him no good. After he opened his throat, he’d open the cages and shoo the birds away, so no messages reached the Wall. Softfoot and Small Paul would kill the Old Bear, Dirk would do Blane, and Lark and his cousins would silence Bannen and old Dywen, to keep them from sniffing after their trail. They’d been caching food for a fortnight, and Sweet Donnel and Clubfoot Karl would have the horses ready. With Mormont dead, command would pass to Ser Ottyn Wythers, an old done man, and failing. He’ll be running for the Wall before sundown, and he won’t waste no men sending them after us neither.
The dogs pulled at him as they made their way through the trees. Chett could see the Fist punching its way up through the green. The day was so dark that the Old Bear had the torches lit, a great circle of them burning all along the ringwall that crowned the top of the steep stony hill. The three of them waded across a brook. The water was icy cold, and patches of ice were spreading across its surface. “I’m going to make for the coast,” Lark the Sisterman confided. “Me and my cousins. We’ll build us a boat, sail back home to the Sisters.”
And at home they’ll know you for deserters and lop off your fool heads, thought Chett. There was no leaving the Night’s Watch, once you said your words. Anywhere in the Seven Kingdoms, they’d take you and kill you.
Ollo Lophand now, he was talking about sailing back to Tyrosh, where he claimed men didn’t lose their hands for a bit of honest thievery, nor get sent off to freeze their life away for being found in bed with some knight’s wife. Chett had weighed going with him, but he didn’t speak their wet girly tongue. And what could he do in Tyrosh? He had no trade to speak of, growing up in Hag’s Mire. His father had spent his life grubbing in other men’s fields and collecting leeches. He’d strip down bare but for a thick leather clout, and go wading in the murky waters. When he climbed out he’d be covered from nipple to ankle. Sometimes he made Chett help pull the leeches off. One had attached itself to his palm once, and he’d smashed it against a wall in revulsion. His father beat him bloody for that. The maesters bought the leeches at twelve-for-a-penny.
Lark could go home if he liked, and the damn Tyroshi too, but not Chett. If he never saw Hag’s Mire again, it would be too bloody soon. He had liked the look of Craster’s Keep, himself. Craster lived high as a lord there, so why shouldn’t he do the same? That would be a laugh. Chett the leechman’s son, a lord with a keep. His banner could be a dozen leeches on a field of pink. But why stop at lord? Maybe he should be a king. Mance Rayder started out a crow. I could be a king same as him, and have me some wives. Craster had nineteen, not even counting the young ones, the daughters he hadn’t gotten around to bedding yet. Half them wives were as old and ugly as Craster, but that didn’t matter. The old ones Chett could put to work cooking and cleaning for him, pulling carrots and slopping pigs, while the young ones warmed his bed and bore his children. Craster wouldn’t object, not once Small Paul gave him a hug.
The only women Chett had ever known were the whores he’d bought in Mole’s Town. When he’d been younger, the village girls took one look at his face, with its boils and its wen, and turned away sickened. The worst was that slattern Bessa. She’d spread her legs for every boy in Hag’s Mire so he’d figured why not him too? He even spent a morning picking wildflowers when he heard she liked them, but she’d just laughed in his face and told him she’d crawl in a bed with his father’s leeches before she’d crawl in one with him. She stopped laughing when he put his knife in her. That was sweet, the look on her face, so he pulled the knife out and put it in her again. When they caught him down near Sevenstreams, old Lord Walder Frey hadn’t even bothered to come himself to do the judging. He’d sent one of his bastards, that Walder Rivers, and the next thing Chett had known he was walking to the Wall with that foul-smelling black devil Yoren. To pay for his one sweet moment, they took his whole life.
But now he meant to take it back, and Craster’s women too. That twisted old wildling has the right of it. If you want a woman to wife you take her, and none of this giving her flowers so that maybe she don’t notice your bloody boils. Chett didn’t mean to make that mistake again.
It would work, he promised himself for the hundredth time. So long as we get away clean. Ser Ottyn would strike south for the Shadow Tower, the shortest way to the Wall. He won’t bother with us, not Wythers, all he’ll want is to get back whole. Thoren Smallwood now, he’d want to press on with the attack, but Ser Ottyn’s caution ran too deep, and he was senior. It won’t matter anyhow. Once we’re gone, Smallwood can attack anyone he likes. What do we care? If none of them ever returns to the Wall, no one will ever come looking for us, they’ll think we died with the rest. That was a new thought, and for a moment it tempted him. But they would need to kill Ser Ottyn and Ser Mallador Locke as well to give Smallwood the command, and both of them were well-attended day and night . . . no, the risk was too great.
“Chett,” said Small Paul as they trudged along a stony game trail through sentinels and soldier pines, “what about the bird?”
“What bloody bird?” The last thing he needed now was some mutton-head going on about a bird.
“The Old Bear’s raven,” Small Paul said. “If we kill him, who’s going to feed his bird?”
“Who bloody well cares? Kill the bird too if you like.”
“I don’t want to hurt no bird,” the big man said. “But that’s a talking bird. What if it tells what we did?”
Lark the Sisterman laughed. “Small Paul, thick as a castle wall,” he mocked.
“You shut up with that,” said Small Paul dangerously.
“Paul,” said Chett, before the big man got too angry, “when they find the old man lying in a pool of blood with his throat slit, they won’t need no bird to tell them someone killed him.”
Small Paul chewed on that a moment. “That’s true,” he allowed. “Can I keep the bird, then? I like that bird.”
“He’s yours,” said Chett, just to shut him up.
“We can always eat him if we get hungry,” offered Lark.
Small Paul clouded up again. “Best not try and eat my bird, Lark. Best not.”
Chett could hear voices drifting through the trees. “Close your bloody mouths, both of you. We’re almost to the Fist.”
They emerged near the west face of the hill, and walked around south where the slope was gentler. Near the edge of the forest a dozen men were taking archery practice. They had carved outlines on the trunks of trees, and were loosing shafts at them. “Look,” said Lark. “A pig with a bow.”
Sure enough, the nearest bowman was Ser Piggy himself, the fat boy who had stolen his place with Maester Aemon. Just the sight of Samwell Tarly filled him with anger. Stewarding for Maester Aemon had been as good a life as he’d ever known. The old blind man was undemanding, and Clydas had taken care of most of his wants anyway. Chett’s duties were easy: cleaning the rookery, a few fires to build, a few meals to fetch . . . and Aemon never once hit him. Thinks he can just walk in and shove me out, on account of being highborn and knowing how to read. Might be I’ll ask him to read my knife before I open his throat with it. “You go on,” he told the others, “I want to watch this.” The dogs were pulling, anxious to go with them, to the food they thought would be waiting at the top. Chett kicked the bitch with the toe of his boot, and that settled them down some.
He watched from the trees as the fat boy wrestled with a longbow as tall as he was, his red moon face screwed up with concentration. Three arrows stood in the ground before him. Tarly nocked and drew, held the draw a long moment as he tried to aim, and let fly. The shaft vanished into the greenery. Chett laughed loudly, a snort of sweet disgust.
“We’ll never find that one, and I’ll be blamed,” announced Edd Tollett, the dour grey-haired squire everyone called Dolorous Edd. “Nothing ever goes missing that they don’t look at me, ever since that time I lost my horse. As if that could be helped. He was white and it was snowing, what did they expect?”
“The wind took that one,” said Grenn, another friend of Lord Snow’s. “Try to hold the bow steady, Sam.”
“It’s heavy,” the fat boy complained, but he pulled the second arrow all the same. This one went high, sailing through the branches ten feet above the target.
“I believe you knocked a leaf off that tree,” said Dolorous Edd. “Fall is falling fast enough, there’s no need to help it.” He sighed. “And we all know what follows fall. Gods, but I am cold. Shoot the last arrow, Samwell, I believe my tongue is freezing to the roof of my mouth.”
Ser Piggy lowered the bow, and Chett thought he was going to start bawling. “It’s too hard.”
“Notch, draw, and loose,” said Grenn. “Go on.”
Dutifully, the fat boy plucked his final arrow from the earth, notched it to his longbow, drew, and released. He did it quickly, without squinting along the shaft painstakingly as he had the first two times. The arrow struck the charcoal outline low in the chest and hung quivering. “I hit him.” Ser Piggy sounded shocked. “Grenn, did you see? Edd, look, I hit him!”
“Put it between his ribs, I’d say,” said Grenn.
“Did I kill him?” the fat boy wanted to know.
Tollett shrugged. “Might have punctured a lung, if he had a lung. Most trees don’t, as a rule.” He took the bow from Sam’s hand. “I’ve seen worse shots, though. Aye, and made a few.”
Ser Piggy was beaming. To look at him you’d think he’d actually done something. But when he saw Chett and the dogs, his smile curled up and died squeaking.
“You hit a tree,” Chett said. “Let’s see how you shoot when it’s Mance Rayder’s lads. They won’t stand there with their arms out and their leaves rustling, oh no. They’ll come right at you, screaming in your face, and I bet you’ll piss those breeches. One o’ them will plant his axe right between those little pig eyes. The last thing you’ll hear will be the thunk it makes when it bites into your skull.”
The fat boy was shaking. Dolorous Edd put a hand on his shoulder. “Brother,” he said solemnly, “just because it happened that way for you doesn’t mean Samwell will suffer the same.”
“What are you talking about, Tollett?”
“The axe that split your skull. Is it true that half your wits leaked out on the ground and your dogs ate them?”
The big lout Grenn laughed, and even Samwell Tarly managed a weak little smile. Chett kicked the nearest dog, yanked on their leashes, and started up the hill. Smile all you want, Ser Piggy. We’ll see who laughs tonight. He only wished he had time to kill Tollett as well. Gloomy horsefaced fool, that’s what he is.
The climb was steep, even on this side of the Fist, which had the gentlest slope. Partway up the dogs started barking and pulling at him, figuring that they’d get fed soon. He gave them a taste of his boot instead, and a crack of the whip for the big ugly one that snapped at him. Once they were tied up, he went to report. “The prints were there like Giant said, but the dogs wouldn’t track,” he told Mormont in front of his big black tent. “Down by the river like that, could be old prints.”
“A pity.” Lord Commander Mormont had a bald head and a great shaggy grey beard, and sounded as tired as he looked. “We might all have been better for a bit of fresh meat.” The raven on his shoulder bobbed its head and echoed, “Meat. Meat. Meat.”
We could cook the bloody dogs, Chett thought, but he kept his mouth shut until the Old Bear sent him on his way. And that’s the last time I’ll need to bow my head to that one, he thought to himself with satisfaction. It seemed to him that it was growing even colder, which he would have sworn wasn’t possible. The dogs huddled together miserably in the hard frozen mud, and Chett was half tempted to crawl in with them. Instead he wrapped a black wool scarf round the lower part of his face, leaving a slit for his mouth between the winds. It was warmer if he kept moving, he found, so he made a slow circuit of the perimeter with a wad of sourleaf, sharing a chew or two with the black brothers on guard and hearing what they had to say. None of the men on the day watch were part of his scheme; even so, he figured it was good to have some sense of what they were thinking.
Mostly what they were thinking was that it was bloody cold.
The wind was rising as the shadows lengthened. It made a high thin sound as it shivered through the stones of the ringwall. “I hate that sound,” little Giant said. “It sounds like a babe in the brush, wailing away for milk.”
When he finished the circuit and returned to the dogs, he found Lark waiting for him. “The officers are in the Old Bear’s tent again, talking something fierce.”
“That’s what they do,” said Chett. “They’re highborn, all but Blane, they get drunk on words instead of wine.”
Lark sidled closer. “Cheese-for-wits keeps going on about the bird,” he warned, glancing about to make certain no one was close. “Now he’s asking if we cached any seed for the damn thing.”
“It’s a raven,” said Chett. “It eats corpses.”
Lark grinned. “His, might be?”
Or yours. It seemed to Chett that they needed the big man more than they needed Lark. “Stop fretting about Small Paul. You do your part, he’ll do his.”
Twilight was creeping through the woods by the time he rid himself of the Sisterman and sat down to edge his sword. It was bloody hard work with his gloves on, but he wasn’t about to take them off. Cold as it was, any fool that touched steel with a bare hand was going to lose a patch of skin.
The dogs whimpered when the sun went down. He gave them water and curses. “Half a night more, and you can find your own feast.” By then he could smell supper.
Dywen was holding forth at the cookfire as Chett got his heel of hardbread and a bowl of bean and bacon soup from Hake the cook. “The wood’s too silent,” the old forester was saying. “No frogs near that river, no owls in the dark. I never heard no deader wood than this.”
“Them teeth of yours sound pretty dead,” said Hake.
Dywen clacked his wooden teeth. “No wolves neither. There was, before, but no more. Where’d they go, you figure?”
“Someplace warm,” said Chett.
Of the dozen odd brothers who sat by the fire, four were his. He gave each one a hard squinty look as he ate, to see if any showed signs of breaking. Dirk seemed calm enough, sitting silent and sharpening his blade, the way he did every night. And Sweet Donnel Hill was all easy japes. He had white teeth and fat red lips and yellow locks that he wore in an artful tumble about his shoulders, and he claimed to be the bastard of some Lannister. Maybe he was at that. Chett had no use for pretty boys, nor for bastards neither, but Sweet Donnel seemed like to hold his own.
He was less certain about the forester the brothers called Sawwood, more for his snoring than for anything to do with trees. Just now he looked so restless he might never snore again. And Maslyn was worse. Chett could see sweat trickling down his face, despite the frigid wind. The beads of moisture sparkled in the firelight, like so many little wet jewels. Maslyn wasn’t eating neither, only staring at his soup as if the smell of it was about to make him sick. I’ll need to watch that one, Chett thought.
“Assemble!” The shout came suddenly, from a dozen throats, and quickly spread to every part of the hilltop camp. “Men of the Night’s Watch! Assemble at the central fire!”
Frowning, Chett finished his soup and followed the rest.
The Old Bear stood before the fire with Smallwood, Locke, Wythers, and Blane ranged behind him in a row. Mormont wore a cloak of thick black fur, and his raven perched upon his shoulder, preening its black feathers. This can’t be good. Chett squeezed between Brown Bernarr and some Shadow Tower men. When everyone was gathered, save for the watchers in the woods and the guards on the ringwall, Mormont cleared his throat and spat. The spittle was frozen before it hit the ground. “Brothers,” he said, “men of the Night’s Watch.”
“Men!” his raven screamed. “Men! Men!”
“The wildlings are on the march, following the course of the Milkwater down out of the mountains. Thoren believes their van will be upon us ten days hence. Their most seasoned raiders will be with Harma Dogshead in that van. The rest will likely form a rearguard, or ride in close company with Mance Rayder himself. Elsewhere their fighters will be spread thin along the line of march. They have oxen, mules, horses . . . but few enough. Most will be afoot, and ill-armed and untrained. Such weapons as they carry are more like to be stone and bone than steel. They are burdened with women, children, herds of sheep and goats, and all their worldly goods besides. In short, though they are numerous, they are vulnerable . . . and they do not know that we are here. Or so we must pray.”
They know, thought Chett. You bloody old pus bag, they know, certain as sunrise. Qhorin Halfhand hasn’t come back, has he? Nor Jarman Buckwell. If any of them got caught, you know damned well the wildlings will have wrung a song or two out of them by now.
Smallwood stepped forward. “Mance Rayder means to break the Wall and bring red war to the Seven Kingdoms. Well, that’s a game two can play. On the morrow we’ll bring the war to him.”
“We ride at dawn with all our strength,” the Old Bear said as a murmur went through the assembly. “We will ride north, and loop around to the west. Harma’s van will be well past the Fist by the time we turn. The foothills of the Frostfangs are full of narrow winding valleys made for ambush. Their line of march will stretch for many miles. We shall fall on them in several places at once, and make them swear we were three thousand, not three hundred.”
“We’ll hit hard and be away before their horsemen can form up to face us,” Thoren Smallwood said. “If they pursue, we’ll lead them a merry chase, then wheel and hit again farther down the column. We’ll burn their wagons, scatter their herds, and slay as many as we can. Mance Rayder himself, if we find him. If they break and return to their hovels, we’ve won. If not, we’ll harry them all the way to the Wall, and see to it that they leave a trail of corpses to mark their progress.”
“There are thousands,” someone called from behind Chett.
“We’ll die.” That was Maslyn’s voice, green with fear.
“Die,” screamed Mormont’s raven, flapping its black wings. “Die, die, die.”
“Many of us,” the Old Bear said. “Mayhaps even all of us. But as another Lord Commander said a thousand years ago, that is why they dress us in black. Remember your words, brothers. For we are the swords in the darkness, the watchers on the walls . . .”
“The fire that burns against the cold.” Ser Mallador Locke drew his longsword.
“The light that brings the dawn,” others answered, and more swords were pulled from scabbards.
Then all of them were drawing, and it was near three hundred upraised swords and as many voices crying, “The horn that wakes the sleepers! The shield that guards the realms of men!” Chett had no choice but to join his voice to the others. The air was misty with their breath, and firelight glinted off the steel. He was pleased to see Lark and Softfoot and Sweet Donnel Hill joining in, as if they were as big fools as the rest. That was good. No sense to draw attention, when their hour was so close.
When the shouting died away, once more he heard the sound of the wind picking at the ringwall. The flames swirled and shivered, as if they too were cold, and in the sudden quiet the Old Bear’s raven cawed loudly and once again said, “Die.”
Clever bird, thought Chett as the officers dismissed them, warning everyone to get a good meal and a long rest tonight. Chett crawled under his furs near the dogs, his head full of things that could go wrong. What if that bloody oath gave one of his a change of heart? Or Small Paul forgot and tried to kill Mormont during the second watch in place of the third? Or Maslyn lost his courage, or someone turned informer, or . . . 
He found himself listening to the night. The wind did sound like a wailing child, and from time to time he could hear men’s voices, a horse’s whinny, a log spitting in the fire. But nothing else. So quiet.
He could see Bessa’s face floating before him. It wasn’t the knife I wanted to put in you, he wanted to tell her. I picked you flowers, wild roses and tansy and goldencups, it took me all morning. His heart was thumping like a drum, so loud he feared it might wake the camp. Ice caked his beard all around his mouth. Where did that come from, with Bessa? Whenever he’d thought of her before, it had only been to remember the way she’d looked, dying. What was wrong with him? He could hardly breathe. Had he gone to sleep? He got to his knees, and something wet and cold touched his nose. Chett looked up.
Snow was falling.
He could feel tears freezing to his cheeks. It isn’t fair, he wanted to scream. Snow would ruin everything he’d worked for, all his careful plans. It was a heavy fall, thick white flakes coming down all about him. How would they find their food caches in the snow, or the game trail they meant to follow east? They won’t need Dywen nor Bannen to hunt us down neither, not if we’re tracking through fresh snow. And snow hid the shape of the ground, especially by night. A horse could stumble over a root, break a leg on a stone. We’re done, he realized. Done before we began. We’re lost. There’d be no lord’s life for the leechman’s son, no keep to call his own, no wives nor crowns. Only a wildling’s sword in his belly, and then an unmarked grave. The snow’s taken it all from me . . . the bloody snow . . . 
Snow had ruined him once before. Snow and his pet pig.
Chett got to his feet. His legs were stiff, and the falling snowflakes turned the distant torches to vague orange glows. He felt as though he were being attacked by a cloud of pale cold bugs. They settled on his shoulders, on his head, they flew at his nose and his eyes. Cursing, he brushed them off. Samwell Tarly, he remembered. I can still deal with Ser Piggy. He wrapped his scarf around his face, pulled up his hood, and went striding through the camp to where the coward slept.
The snow was falling so heavily that he got lost among the tents, but finally he spotted the snug little windbreak the fat boy had made for himself between a rock and the raven cages. Tarly was buried beneath a mound of black wool blankets and shaggy furs. The snow was drifting in to cover him. He looked like some kind of soft round mountain. Steel whispered on leather faint as hope as Chett eased his dagger from its sheath. One of the ravens quorked. “Snow,” another muttered, peering through the bars with black eyes. The first added a “Snow” of its own. He edged past them, placing each foot carefully. He would clap his left hand down over the fat boy’s mouth to muffle his cries, and then . . . 
Uuuuuuuhoooooooooo.
He stopped midstep, swallowing his curse as the sound of the horn shuddered through the camp, faint and far, yet unmistakable. Not now. Gods be damned, not NOW! The Old Bear had hidden far-eyes in a ring of trees around the Fist, to give warning of any approach. Jarman Buckwell’s back from the Giant’s Stair, Chett figured, or Qhorin Half-hand from the Skirling Pass. A single blast of the horn meant brothers returning. If it was the Halfhand, Jon Snow might be with him, alive.
Sam Tarly sat up puffy-eyed and stared at the snow in confusion. The ravens were cawing noisily, and Chett could hear his dogs baying. Half the bloody camp’s awake. His gloved fingers clenched around the dagger’s hilt as he waited for the sound to die away. But no sooner had it gone than it came again, louder and longer.
Uuuuuuuuuuuuhooooooooooooooo.
“Gods,” he heard Sam Tarly whimper. The fat boy lurched to his knees, his feet tangled in his cloak and blankets. He kicked them away and reached for a chainmail hauberk he’d hung on the rock nearby. As he slipped the huge tent of a garment down over his head and wriggled into it, he spied Chett standing there. “Was it two?” he asked. “I dreamed I heard two blasts . . .”
“No dream,” said Chett. “Two blasts to call the Watch to arms. Two blasts for foes approaching. There’s an axe out there with Piggy writ on it, fat boy. Two blasts means wildlings.” The fear on that big moon face made him want to laugh. “Bugger them all to seven hells. Bloody Harma. Bloody Mance Rayder. Bloody Smallwood, he said they wouldn’t be on us for another—”
Uuuuuuuuuuuuuuuhooooooooooooooooooooooooo.
The sound went on and on and on, until it seemed it would never die. The ravens were flapping and screaming, flying about their cages and banging off the bars, and all about the camp the brothers of the Night’s Watch were rising, donning their armor, buckling on swordbelts, reaching for battleaxes and bows. Samwell Tarly stood shaking, his face the same color as the snow that swirled down all around them. “Three,” he squeaked to Chett, “that was three, I heard three. They never blow three. Not for hundreds and thousands of years. Three means—”
“—Others.” Chett made a sound that was half a laugh and half a sob, and suddenly his smallclothes were wet, and he could feel the piss running down his leg, see steam rising off the front of his breeches.

Dragons,” said Mollander. He snatched a withered apple off the ground and tossed it hand to hand.
“Throw the apple,” urged Alleras the Sphinx. He slipped an arrow from his quiver and nocked it to his bowstring. 
“I should like to see a dragon.” Roone was the youngest of them, a chunky boy still two years shy of manhood. “I should like that very much.”
And I should like to sleep with Rosey’s arms around me, Pate thought. He shifted restlessly on the bench. By the morrow the girl could well be his. I will take her far from Oldtown, across the narrow sea to one of the Free Cities. There were no maesters there, no one to accuse him.
He could hear Emma’s laughter coming through a shuttered window overhead, mingled with the deeper voice of the man she was entertaining. She was the oldest of the serving wenches at the Quill and Tankard, forty if she was a day, but still pretty in a fleshy sort of way. Rosey was her daughter, fifteen and freshly flowered. Emma had decreed that Rosey’s maidenhead would cost a golden dragon. Pate had saved nine silver stags and a pot of copper stars and pennies, for all the good that would do him. He would have stood a better chance of hatching a real dragon than saving up enough coin to make a golden one. 
“You were born too late for dragons, lad,” Armen the Acolyte told Roone. Armen wore a leather thong about his neck, strung with links of pewter, tin, lead, and copper, and like most acolytes he seemed to believe that novices had turnips growing from their shoulders in place of heads. “The last one perished during the reign of King Aegon the Third.”
“The last dragon in Westeros,” insisted Mollander.
“Throw the apple,” Alleras urged again. He was a comely youth, their Sphinx. All the serving wenches doted on him. Even Rosey would sometimes touch him on the arm when she brought him wine, and Pate had to gnash his teeth and pretend not to see.
“The last dragon in Westeros was the last dragon,” said Armen doggedly. “That is well known.”
“The apple,” Alleras said. “Unless you mean to eat it.”
“Here.” Dragging his clubfoot, Mollander took a short hop, whirled, and whipped the apple sidearm into the mists that hung above the Honeywine. If not for his foot, he would have been a knight like his father. He had the strength for it in those thick arms and broad shoulders. Far and fast the apple flew . . . 
. . . but not as fast as the arrow that whistled after it, a yard-long shaft of golden wood fletched with scarlet feathers. Pate did not see the arrow catch the apple, but he heard it. A soft chunk echoed back across the river, followed by a splash.
Mollander whistled. “You cored it. Sweet.”
Not half as sweet as Rosey. Pate loved her hazel eyes and budding breasts, and the way she smiled every time she saw him. He loved the dimples in her cheeks. Sometimes she went barefoot as she served, to feel the grass beneath her feet. He loved that too. He loved the clean fresh smell of her, the way her hair curled behind her ears. He even loved her toes. One night she’d let him rub her feet and play with them, and he’d made up a funny tale for every toe to keep her giggling. 
Perhaps he would do better to remain on this side of the narrow sea. He could buy a donkey with the coin he’d saved, and he and Rosey could take turns riding it as they wandered Westeros. Ebrose might not think him worthy of the silver, but Pate knew how to set a bone and leech a fever. The smallfolk would be grateful for his help. If he could learn to cut hair and shave beards, he might even be a barber. That would be enough, he told himself, so long as I had Rosey. Rosey was all that he wanted in the world.
That had not always been so. Once he had dreamed of being a maester in a castle, in service to some open-handed lord who would honor him for his wisdom and bestow a fine white horse on him to thank him for his service. How high he’d ride, how nobly, smiling down at the smallfolk when he passed them on the road . . . 
One night in the Quill and Tankard’s common room, after his second tankard of fearsomely strong cider, Pate had boasted that he would not always be a novice. “Too true,” Lazy Leo had called out. “You’ll be a former novice, herding swine.” 
He drained the dregs of his tankard. The torchlit terrace of the Quill and Tankard was an island of light in a sea of mist this morning. Downriver, the distant beacon of the Hightower floated in the damp of night like a hazy orange moon, but the light did little to lift his spirits. 
The alchemist should have come by now. Had it all been some cruel jape, or had something happened to the man? It would not have been the first time that good fortune had turned sour on Pate. He had once counted himself lucky to be chosen to help old Archmaester Walgrave with the ravens, never dreaming that before long he would also be fetching the man’s meals, sweeping out his chambers, and dressing him every morning. Everyone said that Walgrave had forgotten more of ravencraft than most maesters ever knew, so Pate assumed a black iron link was the least that he could hope for, only to find that Walgrave could not grant him one. The old man remained an archmaester only by courtesy. As great a maester as once he’d been, now his robes concealed soiled smallclothes oft as not, and half a year ago some acolytes found him weeping in the Library, unable to find his way back to his chambers. Maester Gormon sat below the iron mask in Walgrave’s place, the same Gormon who had once accused Pate of theft.
In the apple tree beside the water, a nightingale began to sing. It was a sweet sound, a welcome respite from the harsh screams and endless quorking of the ravens he had tended all day long. The white ravens knew his name, and would mutter it to each other whenever they caught sight of him, “Pate, Pate, Pate,” until he wanted to scream. The big white birds were Archmaester Walgrave’s pride. He wanted them to eat him when he died, but Pate half suspected that they meant to eat him too.
Perhaps it was the fearsomely strong cider—he had not come here to drink, but Alleras had been buying to celebrate his copper link, and guilt had made him thirsty—but it almost sounded as if the nightingale were trilling gold for iron, gold for iron, gold for iron. Which was passing strange, because that was what the stranger had said the night Rosey brought the two of them together. “Who are you?” Pate had demanded of him, and the man had replied, “An alchemist. I can change iron into gold.” And then the coin was in his hand, dancing across his knuckles, the soft yellow gold shining in the candlelight. On one side was a three-headed dragon, on the other the head of some dead king. Gold for iron, Pate remembered, you won’t do better. Do you want her? Do you love her? “I am no thief,” he had told the man who called himself the alchemist, “I am a novice of the Citadel.” The alchemist had bowed his head, and said, “If you should reconsider, I shall return here three days hence, with my dragon.” 
Three days had passed. Pate had returned to the Quill and Tankard, still uncertain what he was, but instead of the alchemist he’d found Mollander and Armen and the Sphinx, with Roone in tow. It would have raised suspicions not to join them.
The Quill and Tankard never closed. For six hundred years it had been standing on its island in the Honeywine, and never once had its doors been shut to trade. Though the tall, timbered building leaned toward the south the way novices sometimes leaned after a tankard, Pate expected that the inn would go on standing for another six hundred years, selling wine and ale and fearsomely strong cider to rivermen and seamen, smiths and singers, priests and princes, and the novices and acolytes of the Citadel.
“Oldtown is not the world,” declared Mollander, too loudly. He was a knight’s son, and drunk as drunk could be. Since they brought him word of his father’s death upon the Blackwater, he got drunk most every night. Even in Oldtown, far from the fighting and safe behind its walls, the War of the Five Kings had touched them all . . . although Archmaester Benedict insisted that there had never been a war of five kings, since Renly Baratheon had been slain before Balon Greyjoy had crowned himself. 
“My father always said the world was bigger than any lord’s castle,” Mollander went on. “Dragons must be the least of the things a man might find in Qarth and Asshai and Yi Ti. These sailors’ stories . . .”
“. . . are stories told by sailors,” Armen interrupted. “Sailors, my dear Mollander. Go back down to the docks, and I wager you’ll find sailors who’ll tell you of the mermaids that they bedded, or how they spent a year in the belly of a fish.”
“How do you know they didn’t?” Mollander thumped through the grass, looking for more apples. “You’d need to be down the belly yourself to swear they weren’t. One sailor with a story, aye, a man might laugh at that, but when oarsmen off four different ships tell the same tale in four different tongues . . .”
“The tales are not the same,” insisted Armen. “Dragons in Asshai, dragons in Qarth, dragons in Meereen, Dothraki dragons, dragons freeing slaves . . . each telling differs from the last.”
“Only in details.” Mollander grew more stubborn when he drank, and even when sober he was bullheaded. “All speak of dragons, and a beautiful young queen.” 
The only dragon Pate cared about was made of yellow gold. He wondered what had happened to the alchemist. The third day. He said he’d be here.

“There’s another apple near your foot,” Alleras called to Mollander, “and I still have two arrows in my quiver.”
“Fuck your quiver.” Mollander scooped up the windfall. “This one’s wormy,” he complained, but he threw it anyway. The arrow caught the apple as it began to fall and sliced it clean in two. One half landed on a turret roof, tumbled to a lower roof, bounced, and missed Armen by a foot. “If you cut a worm in two, you make two worms,” the acolyte informed them.
“If only it worked that way with apples, no one would ever need go hungry,” said Alleras with one of his soft smiles. The Sphinx was always smiling, as if he knew some secret jape. It gave him a wicked look that went well with his pointed chin, widow’s peak, and dense mat of close-cropped jet-black curls. 
Alleras would make a maester. He had only been at the Citadel for a year, yet already he had forged three links of his maester’s chain. Armen might have more, but each of his had taken him a year to earn. Still, he would make a maester too. Roone and Mollander remained pink-necked novices, but Roone was very young and Mollander preferred drinking to reading. 
Pate, though . . . 
He had been five years at the Citadel, arriving when he was no more than three-and-ten, yet his neck remained as pink as it had been on the day he first arrived from the westerlands. Twice had he believed himself ready. The first time he had gone before Archmaester Vaellyn to demonstrate his knowledge of the heavens. Instead he learned how Vinegar Vaellyn had earned that name. It took Pate two years to summon up the courage to try again. This time he submitted himself to kindly old Archmaester Ebrose, renowned for his soft voice and gentle hands, but Ebrose’s sighs had somehow proved just as painful as Vaellyn’s barbs. 
“One last apple,” promised Alleras, “and I will tell you what I suspect about these dragons.”
“What could you know that I don’t?” grumbled Mollander. He spied an apple on a branch, jumped up, pulled it down, and threw. Alleras drew his bowstring back to his ear, turning gracefully to follow the target in flight. He loosed his shaft just as the apple began to fall.
“You always miss your last shot,” said Roone.
The apple splashed down into the river, untouched. 
“See?” said Roone.
“The day you make them all is the day you stop improving.” Alleras unstrung his longbow and eased it into its leather case. The bow was carved from goldenheart, a rare and fabled wood from the Summer Isles. Pate had tried to bend it once, and failed. The Sphinx looks slight, but there’s strength in those slim arms, he reflected, as Alleras threw a leg across the bench and reached for his wine cup. “The dragon has three heads,” he announced in his soft Dornish drawl. 
“Is this a riddle?” Roone wanted to know. “Sphinxes always speak in riddles in the tales.”
“No riddle.” Alleras sipped his wine. The rest of them were quaffing tankards of the fearsomely strong cider that the Quill and Tankard was renowned for, but he preferred the strange, sweet wines of his mother’s country. Even in Oldtown such wines did not come cheap. 
It had been Lazy Leo who dubbed Alleras “the Sphinx.” A sphinx is a bit of this, a bit of that: a human face, the body of a lion, the wings of a hawk. Alleras was the same: his father was a Dornishman, his mother a black-skinned Summer Islander. His own skin was dark as teak. And like the green marble sphinxes that flanked the Citadel’s main gate, Alleras had eyes of onyx.
“No dragon has ever had three heads except on shields and banners,” Armen the Acolyte said firmly. “That was a heraldic charge, no more. Furthermore, the Targaryens are all dead.”
“Not all,” said Alleras. “The Beggar King had a sister.”
“I thought her head was smashed against a wall,” said Roone.
“No,” said Alleras. “It was Prince Rhaegar’s young son Aegon whose head was dashed against the wall by the Lion of Lannister’s brave men. We speak of Rhaegar’s sister, born on Dragonstone before its fall. The one they called Daenerys.”
“The Stormborn. I recall her now.” Mollander lifted his tankard high, sloshing the cider that remained. “Here’s to her!” He gulped, slammed his empty tankard down, belched, and wiped his mouth with the back of his hand. “Where’s Rosey? Our rightful queen deserves another round of cider, wouldn’t you say?”
Armen the Acolyte looked alarmed. “Lower your voice, fool. You should not even jape about such things. You never know who could be listening. The Spider has ears everywhere.”
“Ah, don’t piss your breeches, Armen. I was proposing a drink, not a rebellion.”
Pate heard a chuckle. A soft, sly voice called out from behind him. “I always knew you were a traitor, Hopfrog.” Lazy Leo was slouching by the foot of the old plank bridge, draped in satin striped in green and gold, with a black silk half cape pinned to his shoulder by a rose of jade. The wine he’d dribbled down his front had been a robust red, judging from the color of the spots. A lock of his ash-blond hair fell down across one eye.
Mollander bristled at the sight of him. “Bugger that. Go away. You are not welcome here.” Alleras laid a hand upon his arm to calm him, whilst Armen frowned. “Leo. My lord. I had understood that you were still confined to the Citadel for . . .”
“. . . three more days.” Lazy Leo shrugged. “Perestan says the world is forty thousand years old. Mollos says five hundred thousand. What are three days, I ask you?” Though there were a dozen empty tables on the terrace, Leo sat himself at theirs. “Buy me a cup of Arbor gold, Hopfrog, and perhaps I won’t inform my father of your toast. The tiles turned against me at the Checkered Hazard, and I wasted my last stag on supper. Suckling pig in plum sauce, stuffed with chestnuts and white truffles. A man must eat. What did you lads have?”
“Mutton,” muttered Mollander. He sounded none too pleased about it. “We shared a haunch of boiled mutton.”
“I’m certain it was filling.” Leo turned to Alleras. “A lord’s son should be open-handed, Sphinx. I understand you won your copper link. I’ll drink to that.”
Alleras smiled back at him. “I only buy for friends. And I am no lord’s son, I’ve told you that. My mother was a trader.”
Leo’s eyes were hazel, bright with wine and malice. “Your mother was a monkey from the Summer Isles. The Dornish will fuck anything with a hole between its legs. Meaning no offense. You may be brown as a nut, but at least you bathe. Unlike our spotted pig boy.” He waved a hand toward Pate. 
If I hit him in the mouth with my tankard, I could knock out half his teeth, Pate thought. Spotted Pate the pig boy was the hero of a thousand ribald stories: a good-hearted, empty-headed lout who always managed to best the fat lordlings, haughty knights, and pompous septons who beset him. Somehow his stupidity would turn out to have been a sort of uncouth cunning; the tales always ended with Spotted Pate sitting on a lord’s high seat or bedding some knight’s daughter. But those were stories. In the real world pig boys never fared so well. Pate sometimes thought his mother must have hated him to have named him as she did.
Alleras was no longer smiling. “You will apologize.”
“Will I?” said Leo. “How can I, with my throat so dry . . .”
“You shame your House with every word you say,” Alleras told him. “You shame the Citadel by being one of us.”
“I know. So buy me some wine, that I might drown my shame.”
Mollander said, “I would tear your tongue out by the roots.” 
“Truly? Then how would I tell you about the dragons?” Leo shrugged again. “The mongrel has the right of it. The Mad King’s daughter is alive, and she’s hatched herself three dragons.”
“Three?” said Roone, astonished.
Leo patted his hand. “More than two and less than four. I would not try for my golden link just yet if I were you.”
“You leave him be,” warned Mollander. 
“Such a chivalrous Hopfrog. As you wish. Every man off every ship that’s sailed within a hundred leagues of Qarth is speaking of these dragons. A few will even tell you that they’ve seen them. The Mage is inclined to believe them.”
Armen pursed his lips in disapproval. “Marwyn is unsound. Archmaester Perestan would be the first to tell you that.”
“Archmaester Ryam says so too,” said Roone.
Leo yawned. “The sea is wet, the sun is warm, and the menagerie hates the mastiff.” 
He has a mocking name for everyone, thought Pate, but he could not deny that Marwyn looked more a mastiff than a maester. As if he wants to bite you. The Mage was not like other maesters. People said that he kept company with whores and hedge wizards, talked with hairy Ibbenese and pitch-black Summer Islanders in their own tongues, and sacrificed to queer gods at the little sailors’ temples down by the wharves. Men spoke of seeing him down in the undercity, in rat pits and black brothels, consorting with mummers, singers, sellswords, even beggars. Some even whispered that once he had killed a man with his fists. 
When Marwyn had returned to Oldtown, after spending eight years in the east mapping distant lands, searching for lost books, and studying with warlocks and shadowbinders, Vinegar Vaellyn had dubbed him “Marwyn the Mage.” The name was soon all over Oldtown, to Vaellyn’s vast annoyance. “Leave spells and prayers to priests and septons and bend your wits to learning truths a man can trust in,” Archmaester Ryam had once counseled Pate, but Ryam’s ring and rod and mask were yellow gold, and his maester’s chain had no link of Valyrian steel.
Armen looked down his nose at Lazy Leo. He had the perfect nose for it, long and thin and pointed. “Archmaester Marwyn believes in many curious things,” he said, “but he has no more proof of dragons than Mollander. Just more sailors’ stories.” 
“You’re wrong,” said Leo. “There is a glass candle burning in the Mage’s chambers.”
A hush fell over the torchlit terrace. Armen sighed and shook his head. Mollander began to laugh. The Sphinx studied Leo with his big black eyes. Roone looked lost. 
Pate knew about the glass candles, though he had never seen one burn. They were the worst-kept secret of the Citadel. It was said that they had been brought to Oldtown from Valyria a thousand years before the Doom. He had heard there were four; one was green and three were black, and all were tall and twisted.
“What are these glass candles?” asked Roone.
Armen the Acolyte cleared his throat. “The night before an acolyte says his vows, he must stand a vigil in the vault. No lantern is permitted him, no torch, no lamp, no taper . . . only a candle of obsidian. He must spend the night in darkness, unless he can light that candle. Some will try. The foolish and the stubborn, those who have made a study of these so-called higher mysteries. Often they cut their fingers, for the ridges on the candles are said to be as sharp as razors. Then, with bloody hands, they must wait upon the dawn, brooding on their failure. Wiser men simply go to sleep, or spend their night in prayer, but every year there are always a few who must try.”
“Yes.” Pate had heard the same stories. “But what’s the use of a candle that casts no light?”
“It is a lesson,” Armen said, “the last lesson we must learn before we don our maester’s chains. The glass candle is meant to represent truth and learning, rare and beautiful and fragile things. It is made in the shape of a candle to remind us that a maester must cast light wherever he serves, and it is sharp to remind us that knowledge can be dangerous. Wise men may grow arrogant in their wisdom, but a maester must always remain humble. The glass candle reminds us of that as well. Even after he has said his vow and donned his chain and gone forth to serve, a maester will think back on the darkness of his vigil and remember how nothing that he did could make the candle burn . . . for even with knowledge, some things are not possible.” 
Lazy Leo burst out laughing. “Not possible for you, you mean. I saw the candle burning with my own eyes.”
“You saw some candle burning, I don’t doubt,” said Armen. “A candle of black wax, perhaps.”
“I know what I saw. The light was queer and bright, much brighter than any beeswax or tallow candle. It cast strange shadows and the flame never flickered, not even when a draft blew through the open door behind me.”
Armen crossed his arms. “Obsidian does not burn.”
“Dragonglass,” Pate said. “The smallfolk call it dragonglass.” Somehow that seemed important. 
“They do,” mused Alleras, the Sphinx, “and if there are dragons in the world again . . .”
“Dragons and darker things,” said Leo. “The grey sheep have closed their eyes, but the mastiff sees the truth. Old powers waken. Shadows stir. An age of wonder and terror will soon be upon us, an age for gods and heroes.” He stretched, smiling his lazy smile. “That’s worth a round, I’d say.”
“We’ve drunk enough,” said Armen. “Morn will be upon us sooner than we’d like, and Archmaester Ebrose will be speaking on the properties of urine. Those who mean to forge a silver link would do well not to miss his talk.”
“Far be it from me to keep you from the piss tasting,” said Leo. “Myself, I prefer the taste of Arbor gold.”
“If the choice is piss or you, I’ll drink piss.” Mollander pushed back from the table. “Come, Roone.”
The Sphinx reached for his bowcase. “It’s bed for me as well. I expect I’ll dream of dragons and glass candles.”
“All of you?” Leo shrugged. “Well, Rosey will remain. Perhaps I’ll wake our little sweetmeat and make a woman of her.”
Alleras saw the look on Pate’s face. “If he does not have a copper for a cup of wine, he cannot have a dragon for the girl.”
“Aye,” said Mollander. “Besides, it takes a man to make a woman. Come with us, Pate. Old Walgrave will wake when the sun comes up. He’ll be needing you to help him to the privy.”
If he remembers who I am today. Archmaester Walgrave had no trouble telling one raven from another, but he was not so good with people. Some days he seemed to think Pate was someone named Cressen. “Not just yet,” he told his friends. “I’m going to stay awhile.” Dawn had not broken, not quite. The alchemist might still be coming, and Pate meant to be here if he did.
“As you wish,” said Armen. Alleras gave Pate a lingering look, then slung his bow over one slim shoulder and followed the others toward the bridge. Mollander was so drunk he had to walk with a hand on Roone’s shoulder to keep from falling. The Citadel was no great distance as the raven flies, but none of them were ravens and Oldtown was a veritable labyrinth of a city, all wynds and crisscrossing alleys and narrow crookback streets. “Careful,” Pate heard Armen say as the river mists swallowed up the four of them, “the night is damp, and the cobbles will be slippery.”
When they were gone, Lazy Leo considered Pate sourly across the table. “How sad. The Sphinx has stolen off with all his silver, abandoning me to Spotted Pate the pig boy.” He stretched, yawning. “How is our lovely little Rosey, pray?”
“She’s sleeping,” Pate said curtly.
“Naked, I don’t doubt.” Leo grinned. “Do you think she’s truly worth a dragon? One day I suppose I must find out.” 
Pate knew better than to reply to that.
Leo needed no reply. “I expect that once I’ve broken in the wench, her price will fall to where even pig boys will be able to afford her. You ought to thank me.”
I ought to kill you, Pate thought, but he was not near drunk enough to throw away his life. Leo had been trained to arms, and was known to be deadly with bravo’s blade and dagger. And if Pate should somehow kill him, it would mean his own head too. Leo had two names where Pate had only one, and his second was Tyrell. Ser Moryn Tyrell, commander of the City Watch of Oldtown, was Leo’s father. Mace Tyrell, Lord of Highgarden and Warden of the South, was Leo’s cousin. And Oldtown’s Old Man, Lord Leyton of the Hightower, who numbered “Protector of the Citadel” amongst his many titles, was a sworn bannerman of House Tyrell. Let it go, Pate told himself. He says these things just to wound me.

The mists were lightening to the east. Dawn, Pate realized. Dawn has come, and the alchemist has not. He did not know whether he should laugh or cry. Am I still a thief if I put it all back and no one ever knows? It was another question that he had no answer for, like those that Ebrose and Vaellyn had once asked him.
When he pushed back from the bench and got to his feet, the fearsomely strong cider all went to his head at once. He had to put a hand on the table to steady himself. “Leave Rosey be,” he said, by way of parting. “Just leave her be, or I may kill you.”
Leo Tyrell flicked the hair back from his eye. “I do not fight duels with pig boys. Go away.”
Pate turned and crossed the terrace. His heels rang against the weathered planks of the old bridge. By the time he reached the other side, the eastern sky was turning pink. The world is wide, he told himself. If I bought that donkey, I could still wander the roads and byways of the Seven Kingdoms, leeching the smallfolk and picking nits out of their hair. I could sign on to some ship, pull an oar, and sail to Qarth by the Jade Gates to see these bloody dragons for myself. I do not need to go back to old Walgrave and the ravens. 

Yet somehow his feet turned back toward the Citadel. 
When the first shaft of sunlight broke through the clouds to the east, morning bells began to peal from the Sailor’s Sept down by the harbor. The Lord’s Sept joined in a moment later, then the Seven Shrines from their gardens across the Honeywine, and finally the Starry Sept that had been the seat of the High Septon for a thousand years before Aegon landed at King’s Landing. They made a mighty music. Though not so sweet as one small nightingale. 

He could hear singing too, beneath the pealing of the bells. Each morning at first light the red priests gathered to welcome the sun outside their modest wharfside temple. For the night is dark and full of terrors. Pate had heard them cry those words a hundred times, asking their god R’hllor to save them from the darkness. The Seven were gods enough for him, but he had heard that Stannis Baratheon worshiped at the nightfires now. He had even put the fiery heart of R’hllor on his banners in place of the crowned stag. If he should win the Iron Throne, we’ll all need to learn the words of the red priests’ song, Pate thought, but that was not likely. Tywin Lannister had smashed Stannis and R’hllor upon the Blackwater, and soon enough he would finish them and mount the head of the Baratheon pretender on a spike above the gates of King’s Landing.
As the night’s mists burned away, Oldtown took form around him, emerging ghostlike from the predawn gloom. Pate had never seen King’s Landing, but he knew it was a daub-and-wattle city, a sprawl of mud streets, thatched roofs, and wooden hovels. Oldtown was built in stone, and all its streets were cobbled, down to the meanest alley. The city was never more beautiful than at break of day. West of the Honeywine, the Guildhalls lined the bank like a row of palaces. Upriver, the domes and towers of the Citadel rose on both sides of the river, connected by stone bridges crowded with halls and houses. Downstream, below the black marble walls and arched windows of the Starry Sept, the manses of the pious clustered like children gathered round the feet of an old dowager. 
And beyond, where the Honeywine widened into Whispering Sound, rose the Hightower, its beacon fires bright against the dawn. From where it stood atop the bluffs of Battle Island, its shadow cut the city like a sword. Those born and raised in Oldtown could tell the time of day by where that shadow fell. Some claimed a man could see all the way to the Wall from the top. Perhaps that was why Lord Leyton had not made the descent in more than a decade, preferring to rule his city from the clouds.
A butcher’s cart rumbled past Pate down the river road, five piglets in the back squealing in distress. Dodging from its path, he just avoided being spattered as a townswoman emptied a pail of night soil from a window overhead. When I am a maester in a castle I will have a horse to ride, he thought. Then he tripped upon a cobble and wondered who he was fooling. There would be no chain for him, no seat at a lord’s high table, no tall white horse to ride. His days would be spent listening to ravens quork and scrubbing shit stains off Archmaester Walgrave’s smallclothes.
He was on one knee, trying to wipe the mud off his robes, when a voice said, “Good morrow, Pate.”
The alchemist was standing over him.
Pate rose. “The third day . . . you said you would be at the Quill and Tankard.”
“You were with your friends. It was not my wish to intrude upon your fellowship.” The alchemist wore a hooded traveler’s cloak, brown and nondescript. The rising sun was peeking over the rooftops behind his shoulder, so it was hard to make out the face beneath his hood. “Have you decided what you are?” 
Must he make me say it? “I suppose I am a thief.”
“I thought you might be.”
The hardest part had been getting down on his hands and knees to pull the strongbox from underneath Archmaester Walgrave’s bed. Though the box was stoutly made and bound with iron, its lock was broken. Maester Gormon had suspected Pate of breaking it, but that wasn’t true. Walgrave had broken the lock himself, after losing the key that opened it. 
Inside, Pate had found a bag of silver stags, a lock of yellow hair tied up in a ribbon, a painted miniature of a woman who resembled Walgrave (even to her mustache), and a knight’s gauntlet made of lobstered steel. The gauntlet had belonged to a prince, Walgrave claimed, though he could no longer seem to recall which one. When Pate shook it, the key fell out onto the floor. 
If I pick that up, I am a thief, he remembered thinking. The key was old and heavy, made of black iron; supposedly it opened every door at the Citadel. Only the archmaesters had such keys. The others carried theirs upon their person or hid them away in some safe place, but if Walgrave had hidden his, no one would ever have seen it again. Pate snatched up the key and had been halfway to the door before turning back to take the silver too. A thief was a thief, whether he stole a little or a lot. “Pate,” one of the white ravens had called after him, “Pate, Pate, Pate.” 

“Do you have my dragon?” he asked the alchemist.
“If you have what I require.”
“Give it here. I want to see.” Pate did not intend to let himself be cheated.
“The river road is not the place. Come.”
He had no time to think about it, to weigh his choices. The alchemist was walking away. Pate had to follow or lose Rosey and the dragon both, forever. He followed. As they walked, he slipped his hand up into his sleeve. He could feel the key, safe inside the hidden pocket he had sewn there. Maester’s robes were full of pockets. He had known that since he was a boy. 
He had to hurry to keep pace with the alchemist’s longer strides. They went down an alley, around a corner, through the old Thieves Market, along Ragpicker’s Wynd. Finally, the man turned into another alley, narrower than the first. “This is far enough,” said Pate. “There’s no one about. We’ll do it here.”
“As you wish.” 
“I want my dragon.”
“To be sure.” The coin appeared. The alchemist made it walk across his knuckles, the way he had when Rosey brought the two of them together. In the morning light the dragon glittered as it moved, and gave the alchemist’s fingers a golden glow. 
Pate grabbed it from his hand. The gold felt warm against his palm. He brought it to his mouth and bit down on it the way he’d seen men do. If truth be told, he wasn’t sure what gold should taste like, but he did not want to look a fool.
“The key?” the alchemist inquired politely.
Something made Pate hesitate. “Is it some book you want?” Some of the old Valyrian scrolls down in the locked vaults were said to be the only surviving copies in the world.
“What I want is none of your concern.” 
“No.” It’s done, Pate told himself. Go. Run back to the Quill and Tankard, wake Rosey with a kiss, and tell her she belongs to you. Yet still he lingered. “Show me your face.”
“As you wish.” The alchemist pulled his hood down. 
He was just a man, and his face was just a face. A young man’s face, ordinary, with full cheeks and the shadow of a beard. A scar showed faintly on his right cheek. He had a hooked nose, and a mat of dense black hair that curled tightly around his ears. It was not a face Pate recognized. “I do not know you.”
“Nor I you.” 
“Who are you?”
“A stranger. No one. Truly.”
“Oh.” Pate had run out of words. He drew out the key and put it in the stranger’s hand, feeling light-headed, almost giddy. Rosey, he reminded himself. “We’re done, then.” 
He was halfway down the alley when the cobblestones began to move beneath his feet. The stones are slick and wet, he thought, but that was not it. He could feel his heart hammering in his chest. “What’s happening?” he said. His legs had turned to water. “I don’t understand.”
“And never will,” a voice said sadly.
The cobblestones rushed up to kiss him. Pate tried to cry for help, but his voice was failing too. 
His last thought was of Rosey.

The night was rank with the smell of man.
The warg stopped beneath a tree and sniffed, his grey-brown fur dappled by shadow. A sigh of piney wind brought the man-scent to him, over fainter smells that spoke of fox and hare, seal and stag, even wolf. Those were man-smells too, the warg knew; the stink of old skins, dead and sour, near drowned beneath the stronger scents of smoke and blood and rot. Only man stripped the skins from other beasts and wore their hides and hair.
Wargs have no fear of man, as wolves do. Hate and hunger coiled in his belly, and he gave a low growl, calling to his one-eyed brother, to his small sly sister. As he raced through the trees, his packmates followed hard on his heels. They had caught the scent as well. As he ran, he saw through their eyes too and glimpsed himself ahead. The breath of the pack puffed warm and white from long grey jaws. Ice had frozen between their paws, hard as stone, but the hunt was on now, the prey ahead. Flesh, the warg thought, meat.
A man alone was a feeble thing. Big and strong, with good sharp eyes, but dull of ear and deaf to smells. Deer and elk and even hares were faster, bears and boars fiercer in a fight. But men in packs were dangerous. As the wolves closed on the prey, the warg heard the wailing of a pup, the crust of last night’s snow breaking under clumsy man-paws, the rattle of hardskins and the long grey claws men carried.
Swords, a voice inside him whispered, spears.
The trees had grown icy teeth, snarling down from the bare brown branches. One Eye ripped through the undergrowth, spraying snow. His packmates followed. Up a hill and down the slope beyond, until the wood opened before them and the men were there. One was female. The fur-wrapped bundle she clutched was her pup. Leave her for last, the voice whispered, the males are the danger. They were roaring at each other as men did, but the warg could smell their terror. One had a wooden tooth as tall as he was. He flung it, but his hand was shaking and the tooth sailed high.
Then the pack was on them.
His one-eyed brother knocked the tooth-thrower back into a snowdrift and tore his throat out as he struggled. His sister slipped behind the other male and took him from the rear. That left the female and her pup for him.
She had a tooth too, a little one made of bone, but she dropped it when the warg’s jaws closed around her leg. As she fell, she wrapped both arms around her noisy pup. Underneath her furs the female was just skin and bones, but her dugs were full of milk. The sweetest meat was on the pup. The wolf saved the choicest parts for his brother. All around the carcasses, the frozen snow turned pink and red as the pack filled its bellies.
Leagues away, in a one-room hut of mud and straw with a thatched roof and a smoke hole and a floor of hard-packed earth, Varamyr shivered and coughed and licked his lips. His eyes were red, his lips cracked, his throat dry and parched, but the taste of blood and fat filled his mouth, even as his swollen belly cried for nourishment. A child’s flesh, he thought, remembering Bump. Human meat. Had he sunk so low as to hunger after human meat? He could almost hear Haggon growling at him. “Men may eat the flesh of beasts and beasts the flesh of men, but the man who eats the flesh of man is an abomination.”
Abomination. That had always been Haggon’s favorite word. Abomination, abomination, abomination. To eat of human meat was abomination, to mate as wolf with wolf was abomination, and to seize the body of another man was the worst abomination of all. Haggon was weak, afraid of his own power. He died weeping and alone when I ripped his second life from him. Varamyr had devoured his heart himself. He taught me much and more, and the last thing I learned from him was the taste of human flesh.
That was as a wolf, though. He had never eaten the meat of men with human teeth. He would not grudge his pack their feast, however. The wolves were as famished as he was, gaunt and cold and hungry, and the prey … two men and a woman, a babe in arms, fleeing from defeat to death. They would have perished soon in any case, from exposure or starvation. This way was better, quicker. A mercy.
“A mercy,” he said aloud. His throat was raw, but it felt good to hear a human voice, even his own. The air smelled of mold and damp, the ground was cold and hard, and his fire was giving off more smoke than heat. He moved as close to the flames as he dared, coughing and shivering by turns, his side throbbing where his wound had opened. Blood had soaked his breeches to the knee and dried into a hard brown crust.
Thistle had warned him that might happen. “I sewed it up the best I could,” she’d said, “but you need to rest and let it mend, or the flesh will tear open again.”
Thistle had been the last of his companions, a spearwife tough as an old root, warty, windburnt, and wrinkled. The others had deserted them along the way. One by one they fell behind or forged ahead, making for their old villages, or the Milkwater, or Hardhome, or a lonely death in the woods. Varamyr did not know, and could not care. I should have taken one of them when I had the chance. One of the twins, or the big man with the scarred face, or the youth with the red hair. He had been afraid, though. One of the others might have realized what was happening. Then they would have turned on him and killed him. And Haggon’s words had haunted him, and so the chance had passed.
After the battle there had been thousands of them struggling through the forest, hungry, frightened, fleeing the carnage that had descended on them at the Wall. Some had talked of returning to the homes that they’d abandoned, others of mounting a second assault upon the gate, but most were lost, with no notion of where to go or what to do. They had escaped the black-cloaked crows and the knights in their grey steel, but more relentless enemies stalked them now. Every day left more corpses by the trails. Some died of hunger, some of cold, some of sickness. Others were slain by those who had been their brothers-in-arms when they marched south with Mance Rayder, the King-Beyond-the-Wall.
Mance is fallen, the survivors told each other in despairing voices, Mance is taken, Mance is dead. “Harma’s dead and Mance is captured, the rest run off and left us,” Thistle had claimed, as she was sewing up his wound. “Tormund, the Weeper, Sixskins, all them brave raiders. Where are they now?”
She does not know me, Varamyr realized then, and why should she? Without his beasts he did not look like a great man. I was Varamyr Sixskins, who broke bread with Mance Rayder. He had named himself Varamyr when he was ten. A name fit for a lord, a name for songs, a mighty name, and fearsome. Yet he had run from the crows like a frightened rabbit. The terrible Lord Varamyr had gone craven, but he could not bear that she should know that, so he told the spearwife that his name was Haggon. Afterward he wondered why that name had come to his lips, of all those he might have chosen. I ate his heart and drank his blood, and still he haunts me.
One day, as they fled, a rider came galloping through the woods on a gaunt white horse, shouting that they all should make for the Milkwater, that the Weeper was gathering warriors to cross the Bridge of Skulls and take the Shadow Tower. Many followed him; more did not. Later, a dour warrior in fur and amber went from cookfire to cookfire, urging all the survivors to head north and take refuge in the valley of the Thenns. Why he thought they would be safe there when the Thenns themselves had fled the place Varamyr never learned, but hundreds followed him. Hundreds more went off with the woods witch who’d had a vision of a fleet of ships coming to carry the free folk south. “We must seek the sea,” cried Mother Mole, and her followers turned east.
Varamyr might have been amongst them if only he’d been stronger. The sea was grey and cold and far away, though, and he knew that he would never live to see it. He was nine times dead and dying, and this would be his true death. A squirrel-skin cloak, he remembered, he knifed me for a squirrel-skin cloak.
Its owner had been dead, the back of her head smashed into red pulp flecked with bits of bone, but her cloak looked warm and thick. It was snowing, and Varamyr had lost his own cloaks at the Wall. His sleeping pelts and woolen smallclothes, his sheepskin boots and fur-lined gloves, his store of mead and hoarded food, the hanks of hair he took from the women he bedded, even the golden arm rings Mance had given him, all lost and left behind. I burned and I died and then I ran, half-mad with pain and terror. The memory still shamed him, but he had not been alone. Others had run as well, hundreds of them, thousands. The battle was lost. The knights had come, invincible in their steel, killing everyone who stayed to fight. It was run or die.
Death was not so easily outrun, however. So when Varamyr came upon the dead woman in the wood, he knelt to strip the cloak from her, and never saw the boy until he burst from hiding to drive the long bone knife into his side and rip the cloak out of his clutching fingers. “His mother,” Thistle told him later, after the boy had run off. “It were his mother’s cloak, and when he saw you robbing her …”
“She was dead,” Varamyr said, wincing as her bone needle pierced his flesh. “Someone smashed her head. Some crow.”
“No crow. Hornfoot men. I saw it.” Her needle pulled the gash in his side closed. “Savages, and who’s left to tame them?” No one. If Mance is dead, the free folk are doomed. The Thenns, giants, and the Hornfoot men, the cave-dwellers with their filed teeth, and the men of the western shore with their chariots of bone … all of them were doomed as well. Even the crows. They might not know it yet, but those black-cloaked bastards would perish with the rest. The enemy was coming.
Haggon’s rough voice echoed in his head. “You will die a dozen deaths, boy, and every one will hurt … but when your true death comes, you will live again. The second life is simpler and sweeter, they say.”
Varamyr Sixskins would know the truth of that soon enough. He could taste his true death in the smoke that hung acrid in the air, feel it in the heat beneath his fingers when he slipped a hand under his clothes to touch his wound. The chill was in him too, though, deep down in his bones. This time it would be cold that killed him.
His last death had been by fire. I burned. At first, in his confusion, he thought some archer on the Wall had pierced him with a flaming arrow … but the fire had been inside him, consuming him. And the pain …
Varamyr had died nine times before. He had died once from a spear thrust, once with a bear’s teeth in his throat, and once in a wash of blood as he brought forth a stillborn cub. He died his first death when he was only six, as his father’s axe crashed through his skull. Even that had not been so agonizing as the fire in his guts, crackling along his wings, devouring him. When he tried to fly from it, his terror fanned the flames and made them burn hotter. One moment he had been soaring above the Wall, his eagle’s eyes marking the movements of the men below. Then the flames had turned his heart into a blackened cinder and sent his spirit screaming back into his own skin, and for a little while he’d gone mad. Even the memory was enough to make him shudder.
That was when he noticed that his fire had gone out.
Only a grey-and-black tangle of charred wood remained, with a few embers glowing in the ashes. There’s still smoke, it just needs wood. Gritting his teeth against the pain, Varamyr crept to the pile of broken branches Thistle had gathered before she went off hunting, and tossed a few sticks onto the ashes. “Catch,” he croaked. “Burn.” He blew upon the embers and said a wordless prayer to the nameless gods of wood and hill and field.
The gods gave no answer. After a while, the smoke ceased to rise as well. Already the little hut was growing colder. Varamyr had no flint, no tinder, no dry kindling. He would never get the fire burning again, not by himself. “Thistle,” he called out, his voice hoarse and edged with pain. “Thistle!”
Her chin was pointed and her nose flat, and she had a mole on one cheek with four dark hairs growing from it. An ugly face, and hard, yet he would have given much to glimpse it in the door of the hut. I should have taken her before she left. How long had she been gone? Two days? Three? Varamyr was uncertain. It was dark inside the hut, and he had been drifting in and out of sleep, never quite sure if it was day or night outside. “Wait,” she’d said. “I will be back with food.” So like a fool he’d waited, dreaming of Haggon and Bump and all the wrongs he had done in his long life, but days and nights had passed and Thistle had not returned. She won’t be coming back. Varamyr wondered if he had given himself away. Could she tell what he was thinking just from looking at him, or had he muttered in his fever dream?
Abomination, he heard Haggon saying. It was almost as if he were here, in this very room. “She is just some ugly spearwife,” Varamyr told him. “I am a great man. I am Varamyr, the warg, the skinchanger, it is not right that she should live and I should die.” No one answered. There was no one there. Thistle was gone. She had abandoned him, the same as all the rest.
His own mother had abandoned him as well. She cried for Bump, but she never cried for me. The morning his father pulled him out of bed to deliver him to Haggon, she would not even look at him. He had shrieked and kicked as he was dragged into the woods, until his father slapped him and told him to be quiet. “You belong with your own kind,” was all he said when he flung him down at Haggon’s feet.
He was not wrong, Varamyr thought, shivering. Haggon taught me much and more. He taught me how to hunt and fish, how to butcher a carcass and bone a fish, how to find my way through the woods. And he taught me the way of the warg and the secrets of the skinchanger, though my gift was stronger than his own.
Years later he had tried to find his parents, to tell them that their Lump had become the great Varamyr Sixskins, but both of them were dead and burned. Gone into the trees and streams, gone into the rocks and earth. Gone to dirt and ashes. That was what the woods witch told his mother, the day Bump died. Lump did not want to be a clod of earth. The boy had dreamed of a day when bards would sing of his deeds and pretty girls would kiss him. When I am grown I will be the King-Beyond-the-Wall, Lump had promised himself. He never had, but he had come close. Varamyr Sixskins was a name men feared. He rode to battle on the back of a snow bear thirteen feet tall, kept three wolves and a shadowcat in thrall, and sat at the right hand of Mance Rayder. It was Mance who brought me to this place. I should not have listened. I should have slipped inside my bear and torn him to pieces.
Before Mance, Varamyr Sixskins had been a lord of sorts. He lived alone in a hall of moss and mud and hewn logs that had once been Haggon’s, attended by his beasts. A dozen villages did him homage in bread and salt and cider, offering him fruit from their orchards and vegetables from their gardens. His meat he got himself. Whenever he desired a woman he sent his shadowcat to stalk her, and whatever girl he’d cast his eye upon would follow meekly to his bed. Some came weeping, aye, but still they came. Varamyr gave them his seed, took a hank of their hair to remember them by, and sent them back. From time to time, some village hero would come with spear in hand to slay the beastling and save a sister or a lover or a daughter. Those he killed, but he never harmed the women. Some he even blessed with children. Runts. Small, puny things, like Lump, and not one with the gift.
Fear drove him to his feet, reeling. Holding his side to staunch the seep of blood from his wound, Varamyr lurched to the door and swept aside the ragged skin that covered it to face a wall of white. Snow. No wonder it had grown so dark and smoky inside. The falling snow had buried the hut.
When Varamyr pushed at it, the snow crumbled and gave way, still soft and wet. Outside, the night was white as death; pale thin clouds danced attendance on a silver moon, while a thousand stars watched coldly. He could see the humped shapes of other huts buried beneath drifts of snow, and beyond them the pale shadow of a weirwood armored in ice. To the south and west the hills were a vast white wilderness where nothing moved except the blowing snow. “Thistle,” Varamyr called feebly, wondering how far she could have gone. “Thistle. Woman. Where are you?”
Far away, a wolf gave howl.
A shiver went through Varamyr. He knew that howl as well as Lump had once known his mother’s voice. One Eye. He was the oldest of his three, the biggest, the fiercest. Stalker was leaner, quicker, younger, Sly more cunning, but both went in fear of One Eye. The old wolf was fearless, relentless, savage.
Varamyr had lost control of his other beasts in the agony of the eagle’s death. His shadowcat had raced into the woods, whilst his snow bear turned her claws on those around her, ripping apart four men before falling to a spear. She would have slain Varamyr had he come within her reach. The bear hated him, had raged each time he wore her skin or climbed upon her back.
His wolves, though …
My brothers. My pack. Many a cold night he had slept with his wolves, their shaggy bodies piled up around him to help keep him warm. When I die they will feast upon my flesh and leave only bones to greet the thaw come spring. The thought was queerly comforting. His wolves had often foraged for him as they roamed; it seemed only fitting that he should feed them in the end. He might well begin his second life tearing at the warm dead flesh of his own corpse.
Dogs were the easiest beasts to bond with; they lived so close to men that they were almost human. Slipping into a dog’s skin was like putting on an old boot, its leather softened by wear. As a boot was shaped to accept a foot, a dog was shaped to accept a collar, even a collar no human eye could see. Wolves were harder. A man might befriend a wolf, even break a wolf, but no man could truly tame a wolf. “Wolves and women wed for life,” Haggon often said. “You take one, that’s a marriage. The wolf is part of you from that day on, and you’re part of him. Both of you will change.”
Other beasts were best left alone, the hunter had declared. Cats were vain and cruel, always ready to turn on you. Elk and deer were prey; wear their skins too long, and even the bravest man became a coward. Bears, boars, badgers, weasels … Haggon did not hold with such. “Some skins you never want to wear, boy. You won’t like what you’d become.” Birds were the worst, to hear him tell it. “Men were not meant to leave the earth. Spend too much time in the clouds and you never want to come back down again. I know skinchangers who’ve tried hawks, owls, ravens. Even in their own skins, they sit moony, staring up at the bloody blue.”
Not all skinchangers felt the same, however. Once, when Lump was ten, Haggon had taken him to a gathering of such. The wargs were the most numerous in that company, the wolf-brothers, but the boy had found the others stranger and more fascinating. Borroq looked so much like his boar that all he lacked was tusks, Orell had his eagle, Briar her shadowcat (the moment he saw them, Lump wanted a shadowcat of his own), the goat woman Grisella …
None of them had been as strong as Varamyr Sixskins, though, not even Haggon, tall and grim with his hands as hard as stone. The hunter died weeping after Varamyr took Greyskin from him, driving him out to claim the beast for his own. No second life for you, old man. Varamyr Threeskins, he’d called himself back then. Greyskin made four, though the old wolf was frail and almost toothless and soon followed Haggon into death.
Varamyr could take any beast he wanted, bend them to his will, make their flesh his own. Dog or wolf, bear or badger …
Thistle, he thought.
Haggon would call it an abomination, the blackest sin of all, but Haggon was dead, devoured, and burned. Mance would have cursed him as well, but Mance was slain or captured. No one will ever know. I will be Thistle the spearwife, and Varamyr Sixskins will be dead. His gift would perish with his body, he expected. He would lose his wolves, and live out the rest of his days as some scrawny, warty woman … but he would live. If she comes back. If I am still strong enough to take her.
A wave of dizziness washed over Varamyr. He found himself upon his knees, his hands buried in a snowdrift. He scooped up a fistful of snow and filled his mouth with it, rubbing it through his beard and against his cracked lips, sucking down the moisture. The water was so cold that he could barely bring himself to swallow, and he realized once again how hot he was.
The snowmelt only made him hungrier. It was food his belly craved, not water. The snow had stopped falling, but the wind was rising, filling the air with crystal, slashing at his face as he struggled through the drifts, the wound in his side opening and closing again. His breath made a ragged white cloud. When he reached the weirwood tree, he found a fallen branch just long enough to use as a crutch. Leaning heavily upon it, he staggered toward the nearest hut. Perhaps the villagers had forgotten something when they fled … a sack of apples, some dried meat, anything to keep him alive until Thistle returned.
He was almost there when his crutch snapped beneath his weight, and his legs went out from under him.
How long he sprawled there with his blood reddening the snow Varamyr could not have said. The snow will bury me. It would be a peaceful death. They say you feel warm near the end, warm and sleepy. It would be good to feel warm again, though it made him sad to think that he would never see the green lands, the warm lands beyond the Wall that Mance used to sing about. “The world beyond the Wall is not for our kind,” Haggon used to say. “The free folk fear skinchangers, but they honor us as well. South of the Wall, the kneelers hunt us down and butcher us like pigs.”
You warned me, Varamyr thought, but it was you who showed me Eastwatch too. He could not have been more than ten. Haggon traded a dozen strings of amber and a sled piled high with pelts for six skins of wine, a block of salt, and a copper kettle. Eastwatch was a better place to trade than Castle Black; that was where the ships came, laden with goods from the fabled lands beyond the sea. The crows knew Haggon as a hunter and a friend to the Night’s Watch, and welcomed the news he brought of life beyond their Wall. Some knew him for a skinchanger too, but no one spoke of that. It was there at Eastwatch-by-the-Sea that the boy he’d been first began to dream of the warm south.
Varamyr could feel the snowflakes melting on his brow. This is not so bad as burning. Let me sleep and never wake, let me begin my second life. His wolves were close now. He could feel them. He would leave this feeble flesh behind, become one with them, hunting the night and howling at the moon. The warg would become a true wolf. Which, though?
Not Sly. Haggon would have called it abomination, but Varamyr had often slipped inside her skin as she was being mounted by One Eye. He did not want to spend his new life as a bitch, though, not unless he had no other choice. Stalker might suit him better, the younger male … though One Eye was larger and fiercer, and it was One Eye who took Sly whenever she went into heat.
“They say you forget,” Haggon had told him, a few weeks before his own death. “When the man’s flesh dies, his spirit lives on inside the beast, but every day his memory fades, and the beast becomes a little less a warg, a little more a wolf, until nothing of the man is left and only the beast remains.”
Varamyr knew the truth of that. When he claimed the eagle that had been Orell’s, he could feel the other skinchanger raging at his presence. Orell had been slain by the turncloak crow Jon Snow, and his hate for his killer had been so strong that Varamyr found himself hating the beastling boy as well. He had known what Snow was the moment he saw that great white direwolf stalking silent at his side. One skinchanger can always sense another. Mance should have let me take the direwolf. There would be a second life worthy of a king. He could have done it, he did not doubt. The gift was strong in Snow, but the youth was untaught, still fighting his nature when he should have gloried in it.
Varamyr could see the weirwood’s red eyes staring down at him from the white trunk. The gods are weighing me. A shiver went through him. He had done bad things, terrible things. He had stolen, killed, raped. He had gorged on human flesh and lapped the blood of dying men as it gushed red and hot from their torn throats. He had stalked foes through the woods, fallen on them as they slept, clawed their entrails from their bellies and scattered them across the muddy earth. How sweet their meat had tasted. “That was the beast, not me,” he said in a hoarse whisper. “That was the gift you gave me.”
The gods made no reply. His breath hung pale and misty in the air. He could feel ice forming in his beard. Varamyr Sixskins closed his eyes.
He dreamt an old dream of a hovel by the sea, three dogs whimpering, a woman’s tears.
Bump. She weeps for Bump, but she never wept for me.
Lump had been born a month before his proper time, and he was sick so often that no one expected him to live. His mother waited until he was almost four to give him a proper name, and by then it was too late. The whole village had taken to calling him Lump, the name his sister Meha had given him when he was still in their mother’s belly. Meha had given Bump his name as well, but Lump’s little brother had been born in his proper time, big and red and robust, sucking greedily at Mother’s teats. She was going to name him after Father. Bump died, though. He died when he was two and I was six, three days before his nameday.
“Your little one is with the gods now,” the woods witch told his mother, as she wept. “He’ll never hurt again, never hunger, never cry. The gods have taken him down into the earth, into the trees. The gods are all around us, in the rocks and streams, in the birds and beasts. Your Bump has gone to join them. He’ll be the world and all that’s in it.”
The old woman’s words had gone through Lump like a knife. Bump sees. He is watching me. He knows. Lump could not hide from him, could not slip behind his mother’s skirts or run off with the dogs to escape his father’s fury. The dogs. Loptail, Sniff, the Growler. They were good dogs. They were my friends.
When his father found the dogs sniffing round Bump’s body, he had no way of knowing which had done it, so he took his axe to all three. His hands shook so badly that it took two blows to silence Sniff and four to put the Growler down. The smell of blood hung heavy in the air, and the sounds the dying dogs had made were terrible to hear, yet Loptail still came when father called him. He was the oldest dog, and his training overcame his terror. By the time Lump slipped inside his skin it was too late.
No, Father, please, he tried to say, but dogs cannot speak the tongues of men, so all that emerged was a piteous whine. The axe crashed into the middle of the old dog’s skull, and inside the hovel the boy let out a scream. That was how they knew. Two days later, his father dragged him into the woods. He brought his axe, so Lump thought he meant to put him down the same way he had done the dogs. Instead he’d given him to Haggon.
Varamyr woke suddenly, violently, his whole body shaking. “Get up,” a voice was screaming, “get up, we have to go. There are hundreds of them.” The snow had covered him with a stiff white blanket. So cold. When he tried to move, he found that his hand was frozen to the ground. He left some skin behind when he tore it loose. “Get up,” she screamed again, “they’re coming.”
Thistle had returned to him. She had him by the shoulders and was shaking him, shouting in his face. Varamyr could smell her breath and feel the warmth of it upon cheeks gone numb with cold. Now, he thought, do it now, or die.
He summoned all the strength still in him, leapt out of his own skin, and forced himself inside her.
Thistle arched her back and screamed.
Abomination. Was that her, or him, or Haggon? He never knew. His old flesh fell back into the snowdrift as her fingers loosened. The spearwife twisted violently, shrieking. His shadowcat used to fight him wildly, and the snow bear had gone half-mad for a time, snapping at trees and rocks and empty air, but this was worse. “Get out, get out!” he heard her own mouth shouting. Her body staggered, fell, and rose again, her hands flailed, her legs jerked this way and that in some grotesque dance as his spirit and her own fought for the flesh. She sucked down a mouthful of the frigid air, and Varamyr had half a heartbeat to glory in the taste of it and the strength of this young body before her teeth snapped together and filled his mouth with blood. She raised her hands to his face. He tried to push them down again, but the hands would not obey, and she was clawing at his eyes. Abomination, he remembered, drowning in blood and pain and madness. When he tried to scream, she spat their tongue out.
The white world turned and fell away. For a moment it was as if he were inside the weirwood, gazing out through carved red eyes as a dying man twitched feebly on the ground and a madwoman danced blind and bloody underneath the moon, weeping red tears and ripping at her clothes. Then both were gone and he was rising, melting, his spirit borne on some cold wind. He was in the snow and in the clouds, he was a sparrow, a squirrel, an oak. A horned owl flew silently between his trees, hunting a hare; Varamyr was inside the owl, inside the hare, inside the trees. Deep below the frozen ground, earthworms burrowed blindly in the dark, and he was them as well. I am the wood, and everything that’s in it, he thought, exulting. A hundred ravens took to the air, cawing as they felt him pass. A great elk trumpeted, unsettling the children clinging to his back. A sleeping direwolf raised his head to snarl at empty air. Before their hearts could beat again he had passed on, searching for his own, for One Eye, Sly, and Stalker, for his pack. His wolves would save him, he told himself.
That was his last thought as a man.
True death came suddenly; he felt a shock of cold, as if he had been plunged into the icy waters of a frozen lake. Then he found himself rushing over moonlit snows with his packmates close behind him. Half the world was dark. One Eye, he knew. He bayed, and Sly and Stalker gave echo.
When they reached the crest the wolves paused. Thistle, he remembered, and a part of him grieved for what he had lost and another part for what he’d done. Below, the world had turned to ice. Fingers of frost crept slowly up the weirwood, reaching out for each other. The empty village was no longer empty. Blue-eyed shadows walked amongst the mounds of snow. Some wore brown and some wore black and some were naked, their flesh gone white as snow. A wind was sighing through the hills, heavy with their scents: dead flesh, dry blood, skins that stank of mold and rot and urine. Sly gave a growl and bared her teeth, her ruff bristling. Not men. Not prey. Not these.
The things below moved, but did not live. One by one, they raised their heads toward the three wolves on the hill. The last to look was the thing that had been Thistle. She wore wool and fur and leather, and over that she wore a coat of hoarfrost that crackled when she moved and glistened in the moonlight. Pale pink icicles hung from her fingertips, ten long knives of frozen blood. And in the pits where her eyes had been, a pale blue light was flickering, lending her coarse features an eerie beauty they had never known in life.
She sees me.

